me back to those first days when I wasn’t as scared of hospitals. Back then I
The film follows Salome as a hot, trash, rock stripper. We see her despondent in her dressing room, eyes over cast with day dreams and visions,the rattle of demonic voices tinkling in the background; She is a concubine of the devil - ‘The Devils Fruit’.
Below standard
1. There will be no special bilingual programs in the schools.
“AND ANY POSSIBILITY OF MABLETHORPE HOSTING THE JIM DAVIDSON COMEBACK JAMBOREE!” I added, still shouting really loudly.
“Hey,” one shouts, “have you heard the good news about Jesus? He’s the son of God, and the one truth path to righteousness and salvation is through him!”
“Oh come on, I shared my name. It’s only fair…” he tries to coax her.
It also means that we're a little more immune to this idea of absolutism: "you're not doing it right" rarely becomes "you're not doing it enough," so while we're definitely more hasty to get territorial than your average Joe, the followers of other subcultures have been known to be even moreso (I'm thinking old school punk or goth here, simply because that's the only other subculture I've ever found myself involved with). Is this to do with the mainstream-ing of lolita fashion? Maybe. Once we're as household of a name as punk, when "cosplay lolita" becomes as common a fashion insult as "mall goth," I wouldn't be surprised if we started getting just as up-in-arms over purism as our alternative fashion predecessors. For now, however, it is important for us to remember that, while territoriality has its place (and I'm not saying we should be all open-arms-y to people who won't understand or appreciate this fashion), but if push comes to shove, I'm certain that she can protect herself just fine without us playing overbearing mothers. Besides- it's not like any of us own this fashion.
I remembered very clearly what it felt like the last time round when I had my first walk from bed to bathroom. It feels like your insides are going to fall out!!! It is a hideous feeling and by the time you get to bathroom you are way too tired for a shower.
And now, just to end this post with a funny picture.... Here's Sawyer. When I asked him what he was doing, he said he was being a ninja. I thought it was funny so I snapped a picture.
We shouldn’t serve in any capacity to get a trophy. If we do, we’re forfeiting heavenly reward, trading eternal glory for a temporary self-esteem boost.
I'm not trying to be racist but how many of you have seen his photo and can now identify him among other Ugandans? He looks so generic, and he probably looks way different now. Why waste time trying to find him and kill him for crimes committed long ago when efforts could be put into finding terrorists who are STILL killing people?!
’Twas my custom to stroll by a clear winding stream,
It's late, it's long, it's pretty much unedited, and it finally makes sense to me.
'Daemon' is Greek and Classical too, of course, but hasn't been used by centuries of poets in the same way. Its link to the modern 'demon' suggests some of the bloody-mindedness often demonstrated by daemons; and it also makes me think of witches' familiars and shamans' spirit-helpers. Though I in no way aspire to be a witch or a shaman, their more down-to-earth, farmyard associations, with their cures for sore-throats and curses on annoying neighbours, suit me and my daemon better. My daemon does not haunt Elysian Fields – though it may perhaps be found grubbing through the great junk-yard of lost and broken things that, according to the fairy-tale, the Four Winds have blown to the Ends of the Earth and there gathered in a heap.
Music is $10. All cover charge goes to the musicians, Americana recording artists AMANDA SHIRES & ROD PICOTT
Manuel: In my case, “Urbano” (Spanish for urban) is just me. It is my mother’s last name, so I can literally say that: “I have an Urbano style inside my blood!”
Alas, in a Democracy, the masses can vote themselves the keys to the Treasury. Now there are only dead moths in the French and Greek treasuries, but that's okay, because the credit cards are still there.
He put the spotlight smack bang on parental responsibility at the inquest of a Gisborne toddler who drowned in a river a few months ago.
The metaphor of brain as computer running software breaks down under scrutiny. However, as a provocation to think in a new way, it helped people break new ground. Instead of being stuck in the stories they created to rationalize their problems, it provoked people to look at the process of experiencing that problem. Instead of labelling states like confidence as unteachable, it provoked people to study the process of becoming confident.
I've used one of this week's new Oliphant images on my tag as well as:
And we call that liberation? More like pissing on a Rembrandt.
Of the possibility of who I might become and where that may lead me
18. We're Making Enemies Faster than We Can Kill Them
Available from the National Museum of the American Indian (NMAI) at the Smithsonian Institution is a wonderful CD called Pulling Down the Clouds: Contemporary Native Writers Read Their Work.
Molesting a child is more than “inappropriate contact”, it’s the rape of a child’s very soul. No church or ministry is above the law, and certainly not above the law of God. Shame on the churches who are, or have been guilty of collusion and cover up in these sex crimes against children.
The most striking thing about a visit to this neighborhood is the extraordinary numbers of people who are wearing traditional non-western dress. Turbans, Saris, Burqas and other unusual dress dominate the streets and shops, which themselves are a menagerie of merchants featuring products and foods catering to these varied cultural groups. Food alone is enough reason to visit Jackson Heights.
I use to want to be thicker, but with age I’ve learned to appreciate my figure. I’m grateful that I don’t have to hit the gym multiple times a week, I can eat at whatever time I’d like, and I’m not miserable from dieting. It’s comical to me how non-skinny bitches like to comment on our size, but so desperately try to be smaller. It’s pathetic that to feel better about themselves, they have to try to put us down. Eating what you want, when you want and any portion you’d like is what living is all about. As we continue to get older, these curvier women will continue to get larger and I’ll be maintaining my cute figure. Perhaps I’ll gain just enough weight with age. I’ll surely be flexing on you hoes and asking, “how you like me now” (just kidding).
The rhetoric is more visible because I made a video. You can see with your own eyes the intensity and emotion of the fights on screen. I wanted to make a video because it would make the rhetoric more exciting an falls in line with the them of what I’m trying to convey.
Women
Not sure which, but it is intimidating.
LAST POST – SILENCE SEEMS TO SAY
Indeed, you need Wisdom (and not just Law) to administer justice, as 1 Kings 3:16-28 immediately illustrates, with the famous story of the two prostitutes and Solomon’s ‘verdict’ that the disputed child should be cut in two. The ‘punch line’ in v 28 is there for our consideration, not just as a description of a nostalgic past:
When the machine is finished, take the dough out, sprinkle a small amount (one tablespoon) of flour on your bench and knead the dough into a smooth ball. You'll notice at this stage, the dough is elastic - if you pull a piece out, it's springy. Shape the loaf, put it in a greased or lined bread tin and let it sit in a warm place until the bread has risen. This will take about 30 minutes in a warm kitchen but up to an hour in a cool one. You could also put your tin on top of a hot water system, or in the sun with a moist tea towel on the top to help it rise. I used three flower pots and divided the dough equally into three portions and added them to the pots.
With the harshness of the Bobek hops dominating my last two pale ales, I thought I'd like something in reserve that wouldn't put off the non-ale drinkers who might frequent our humble abode over the festive season.
Replace curry powder with any meat masala.
“The concert would have been an abomination to Islamic teaching, and they also committed a permit violation,” he said.
Wow...I can't believe it has been almost a month since I last posted on my blog! Well I have been busy to say the least! With Christmas then making a trip to N.C. the day after Christmas. Where did the month of December go!!! Hubby and I left before sunrise on Dec. 26 with perfect weather all the way there. On the way back home was a different story! 30 miles south of Indianapolis we ran into patch's of snowy weather. Where ever it was snowing there were accidents and tie ups, with traffic sometimes at a halt. Four times we had to slow down because of accidents. We saw a total of 25 cars wrecked and being towed away. It took us a hour and a half to go 30 miles!! People were going to fast for the icy conditions on the road. Thank God we made it home safe and sound and a little later then expected.
Once that was done a few more minutes arranging the pitchers & done.
When dad was sick and I went back home, I was amazed at how good it felt to see my friends Janet and Maureen. I also talked to my adult best friend Dawn on the phone and it was so wonderful...Yes, I cried thru most of it, but I got to talk too...
4) Award-winner and the one who has given the prize have to show the link of “Arte y Pico” blog, so everyone will know the origin of this award which is here: Arte y Pico.
Okay so this is how I imagine this conversation went:
I've come to realize that I, like make writers, have the problem of trying to write a book that is probably too big for me. Too hard for me. This lovely thing has required lots of research, color coded outlines to keep everything organized, going back and changing the inconsistencies and I'm just working through the first revision.
We are in a renaissance of water awareness in the West and around the world. The old rules of water use and natural resource use were based on infinite forests and rivers. Now that we’re aware that they are very finite, we’re moving from natural resource to commodity. As a commodity, that means somebody owns our water. For the first time now, that’s inevitable in the unfolding of the planet. What we have to do as people is to be conscious of that. It’s a very complicated discussion and it has to be done with a certain amount of joy or it becomes venomous. It’s not about good guys or bad guys; it’s about people adjusting to evolution.
Instead of chocolate I treated myself to this huge pot of daffodils, they are a new variety called Maria,
2) This is a new beginning. A scary one, but new nonetheless.
For eyes, I listen to my own instincts, rather than go looking for color advice at the makeup counters. Reigning wisdom is to choose colors that complement your eye color, rather than choose the same color. Well, I prefer my eye color and take it from there. My eyes are a combination of gold, green, sea green, and blue. I call it "hazel" but it's more than that, and even MP thought my eyes were blue until we were dating for a while. Since the color impression of my eyes shifts with what I wear, I find green eyeshadow a great way to highlight that part.
I am there.
NARS Mekong eyeshadow: I've been wanting this for a while, but could never justify buying it because of its pricetag. I picked this up with Sephora's VIB 20% discount a few weeks ago. It's a beautiful shimmery DARK chocolate brown. Some have described it as a black with gold glitter -- it is definitely not. I love this on my crease/outer V... it is soooooo pigmented and sooo easy to work with/blend. I've used this every single time I've put make-up on my face this month.
Obama’s popularity was based on many things, including two terms in the Illinois State Senate where he pushed through an ethics reform bill, which most people though impossible, and on his best-selling book, Dreams from My Father, a book contracted for by the publishers after Obama had been elected president of the prestigious journal, Harvard Law Review. Published first in 1995, it was re-published in 2004. You’ve had 14 years to get to your local library and read the book.
On one level, of course, the great long novels represent nothing more than an especially massy story – a map of human motion and connection on a grand scale. But is that all? Their size would be (and sometimes is) worth very little if we did not also take away from them the extended experience of mind, of an encounter with not just a world but a subtle, disembodied intelligence – the narrator – observing and occasionally annotating its ferment. To observe a story-world for weeks, even months, in concert with a novelistic narrator is to return to the world outside the book to find something strangely absent, or limited, or silent about it. Sometimes when we find ourselves missing the characters of a novel, what we are actually missing is the narrator.
Booker today offers what amounts to a tour de table on the state of play on "the so-called debate over global warming" (above – click to enlarge).
As the verdict was read, Casey Anthony cried from her seat in the courtroom, breathing deeply as she looked forward. She then hugged her defense attorney Jose Baez and other members of her defense team.
eyes before breaking on the ball to attempt to jar the ball loose from the receiver or cut in front and make an interception. When in
She also made me a coupon list at church today:
-2 limes (zest & juice)
I was also able to talk to Jean Francois via G+ message and he was kind to share the setup he used last night and some technical issues he had. Here is my summary of his main setup.
1 cognates
-A little bit of Super Bowl talk
Be well and happy,
On occasion I have also used chocolate buds instead of berries, with great results. And when banana's were expensive I pureed tinned pears and used that instead of the banana's. Again, super yummy. I haven't tried it but you could probably throw in some sultanas instead of berries as well.
He believes strongly in his faith.
The decline of the cunning craft in Britain was not however indicative of other European nations: in Italy for example, cunning practitioners continued operating right into the early twenty-first century.
20. Though I was sad to see my family leave, the celebrations continued into the next week with my intern friends. My friend Christa cooked up a fabulous meal, complete with a longtime nickname shout out! I answer to "Neebs," a childhood-college nickname, almost as easily as I answer to "Allison."
Further back along the sidepods, the new exhaust system is routed along the floor and into an open section of floor in the outboard 5cm section of diffuser. This is the same solution as Red Bull has come up with, as already explained this was an obvious area in the 2011 rules for exploitation, as I even proposed this location in my pre-season trends and solutions article. Ferrari route the flattened exhaust inside heat shielding along the floor. The blowing effect of the exhaust passes under the floor for a more effective method of blowing the diffuser. Ferrari wanted to produce the exhaust in glass ceramic composite (such as Pyrosic), but this request was denied by Charlie whiting who clarified the exhaust must be made of materials on the permitted materials list. Such composites, while allowed to be used in some exceptions, are not allowed to be the actual material of the exhaust pipe.
MediaOne of Utah encompasses The Salt Lake Tribune and the Deseret News, as well as specialty publications, interactive media and events throughout the Salt Lake region. MediaOne released its first Consolidated Media Report in 2010, and its second report covers the six months ending Sept. 30, 2011.
Briones pleaded guilty on Dec. 9 to a charge of conspiracy to commit theft or embezzlement of federal program funds. She was implicated in a scheme to take kickbacks from a federal grant linked to LKG Enterprises. As mentioned, this jaw-dropping tale left Grits feeling downright naive. Juvenile boards are a seldom-examined political backwater where few reporters venture, and quite frankly even fewer understand what they're reporting on. I can't help but wonder how many other similar examples one would find if reporters or auditors comprehensively examined school-district and/or juvenile board contracts on truancy in other jurisdictions? Would they discover similar shennanigans in Dallas, or Bexar?
Many congratulations to Carys and Rob, and to all who were shortlisted.
-We were all in the car over the weekend and Gaines was acting a fool like he does sometimes and almost under his breath Reed says, “What are we going to do with that child?” He might have heard that one before too.
However, in preparing for this post I was Divinely Guided to recommend that people check any resources available to them (both online and offline) to see if it is indigenous to their area. If your area has any “nature walks,” the person who leads them could tell you if it is growing in your area.
Haha, no, I swear that isn’t what has happened to me. I just want to address the issue as a whole of men who have been duped by women into having children, and what we can do about it.
When and as I notice these thoughts come up, I stop and breath and do not in any way allow myself to follow them. I direct myself and do not allow within me what I do not want outside myself. I do not allow myself to be placed as an inferior object because it feels good. I direct myself to do what is best, regardless of how it makes me feel.
Here is a great example of how to use antelope pattern in your home. Look at what a statement is made with this pattern going up the stairs! This makes me want to rip out my skank carpet going up my stairs and replace it with some of this yummy antelope pattern...
That being said, the GOSA report is true and factual. And quite powerful. The truth is that we knew there was very damning evidence and that the statistics were sound, even if this particular type of erasure analysis is a relatively blunt instrument. When the report was initially presented, it was obvious that GOSA had not thought through providing district’s guidance or standards for investigation. It stands to reason, as well, that they were so pleased with themselves that they had identified this black-eye for APS (and for Dougherty County/Albany) schools, that they hadn’t thought about what doing an investigation into 58 schools would really take.
Do you prefer the Bond girls to be eye candy, or to have more relevant roles? Is From Russian with Love one of your favorites? Why or why not?
The next day was our free day around Paris. We made the most of this day and got up at 6am (5am UK time) and headed to the metro station at Anvers to watch the sunrise at the top of the Sacre-Coeur. Having been to Paris before I thought I had seen everything but witnessing the sunrise was the most beautiful thing I have ever seen. The sky, so rich in colour, grew more and more intense before the sun rose and revealed the rooftops of Paris all before 8am.
"We need a Malema in this town, we need a Malema," said Faku, before handing the microphone to ANC MP Cedric Frolick.
We did go a few days earlier than we needed to because the girls wanted to go to
May Day is related to the Celtic festival of Beltane. In Irish mythology, the beginning of the summer season started at Bealtaine. Great bonfires would mark a time of purification and transition, heralding in the season in the hope of a good harvest later in the year, and were accompanied with ritual acts to protect the people from any harm by Otherworldly spirits... sooo For all you other Irish like me- Happy May Day!
So for my birthday back in March, I asked for 2 ceiling lights to be installed in the kitchen, the kitchen walls to be painted and a backsplash to be put up. Well, everything had been done except for the backsplash. I couldn't make up my mind between 3 different ones for several weeks, but finally just had to make a decision.
-Started sucking your fist and thumb quite a bit. (You are so loud when you do this and it cracks us up!)
It's been a long walk since I last wrote in this blog. Maybe it takes that long, sometimes, to live enough to have something to say.
I am just a thought away.
“All the time you are fighting, you think only of how to survive. All the time you survive, you wonder why you don’t die,” said Pond, who, after moving to the U.S. and enduring the usual traumas of assimilation, decided upon a third choice: to live.
Cesare tells his father the poison was meant for them, which Alexander can’t believe. He’s outraged at the very idea, as Cesare sends him on his way, then meets up with the still unnamed badass servant. Cesare tells him he’s done well, but the servant says the fun’s not over yet. The plan was to take out the whole damn Borgia family that night. He and Cesare race to Vannozza’s palace, where Vannozza’s putting Lucrezia to bed. Badass Servant finds his accomplices skulking outside and immediately dispatches them, aided by Cesare. Papal guards led by Juan, meanwhile, arrive at Orsini’s palace, where Juan sends the praying cardinals home and orders everyone in the household arrested.
1/2 tsp. kosher salt
Beavers were actively preparing for winter and they provided a source of warm winter furs for trappers. This moon is sometimes also referred to as the Frosty Moon. Others call it the Oak Moon, named after the sacred tree of the Druids which withstands winter storms.
If Mr Linky is missing, or not working,
And you can make a most excellent lobster roll at least as good as Red’s – ask me for my recipe – at home for, at worst, half the price of Red’ $14.95 and you won’t have to wait an hour in line sucking down exhaust fumes. So head further north – anywhere north of Bar Harbor, rent a cottage by the sea, make you own lobster rolls and enjoy the view. That’s my Maine tourism tip for this season.
Rare Bomber Thursday (8/5)
This got us into a lengthy discussion as to the merits of hockey and comparisons with (American) Football.
I'm still just in utter and absolute shock and filled with joy that it's over. Anticipating this surgery was torture. Serious torture. I would lie awake and think about everything. I would remember her past surgeries and how tough they were then imagine this time around being so much harder. I'd worry about complications, I'd think of the worst case scenario. Then I'd tell myself to stop, breathe, and say a prayer to stop my crazy mind. It was hard in the hospital and there's been hard moments since, and people ask how I'm doing it, and I just want to make them understand that it dosn't really matter how hard it is, the happiness to have it over and done with a great outcome makes any hard day or moment okay. I don't think even in my wildest hopes and dreams I would've thought we'd be here 4 1/2 years ago. She was just considered too weak to survive. Everyone goes through hard things. Everyone. I was just talking to a dear friend today that is going through something hard. Completely different, but hard nonetheless.
The hands of the giant clock that stands in the middle of Trafalgar Square is inching under 100 days this week. Only 100 days till the games, but London claims it is ready now.
love is terrible
Me: "About 20 seconds."
Everything at je & jo is made by hand in their little Hell’s Kitchen spot and then peddled around town on tricycles. They use fresh ingredients, as locally sourced as possible. They even use wind power for their kitchen and package the ice cream in compostable sugarcane fiber cups.
Eli and Julianna
Still, the project would be larger than originally announced in December 2003.
This time it wasn't enough. Lines had been crossed, important boundaries. I no longer felt safe in my home.
The ideas that make it through to the final pitch are so watered down and stupid that it suddenly highlights what The Pitch is actually about. This series is a vivid portrait of where personality goes to die – there’s a young lady on one of the teams who looks a bit like Britta Perry from Community and every time she pitches an idea to her boss it comes across with such desperation and is usually followed by a “that’s funny, right?” as if all she wants is some validation that her time hasn’t been completely wasted on an idea for an ad involving talking sandwiches. She doesn’t get it because her boss shuts her down with a look that says ‘I think you’re an idiot’ and it’s all incredibly hard to watch.
It continued to snow our first night there and when we woke up the next morning, there was a fresh blanket of snow covering the trees & deck:
The scheme will cost some $8 billion a year to fully implement, with a payment of $67,000 a year for an individual.
I want to alert you to this TED talk and the challenge that I've accepted to write out my gratitudes and blessings for 21 days in a dedicated journal. In this photo you see other big things filling my life right now. The Mixed Media Journal eBooks that are available here and the green smoothies that have brought me control over my junk fooding and 10 pounds of weight loss. Had to shop for smaller levis and (ahem) underwear. Feeling mighty spunky about that.
Now I do have a theory. It’s Dumas. I had the same trouble with The Count of Monte Cristo. I had to force myself to sit and read that. I also had a little bit of a time with The Last of the Mohicans (I know American not British). So maybe it’s men, not just Dumas?
I need my beautiful sleep for having my picture taken tomorrow for my I.D badge, quite funny since I will need to hand in my notice at the end of July. OH WELL, to be honest I welcome the change. Finishing at 8pm everyday is taking its toll on me, by the time I get home (takes me an hour) I practically have to eat my dinner quickly, sort out my bag and outfit for the next day and then go to bed. BAH I don't like it GRRR. Enough moaning. I am retiring to my bed chambers.
To accomplish these goals Sustein proposes sending covert agents into “chat rooms, online social networks, or even real-space groups.” He also wants the Government to secretly pay “independent” credible voices to bolster the government’s messaging to those who don’t believe official sources. Anyone advocating false “conspiracy theories,” would be targeted.
will be need to be paid back
Did you celebrate when CM Punk won the title from John Cena back in Chicago way back when? How about when Daniel Bryan pinned the Big Show? When Zack Ryder finally climbed the tower to achieve his first official championship, despite his custom made title carrying a lot more weight (no pun intended)? Let me make it perfectly clear: you can count on one hand how many titles in the big two companies of professional wrestling are worth even a fourth of a damn. Why, you may be asking? Because the titles are merely for show now.
maybe even years.
I'm not the first to question Leo's insistence on dead wives, check out Nathaniel R's awesome Dead Wives Club poster above. But this entry I thinks answers the question why he always has one. An anima has actually more power in her 'dead' state, she is neither bound up in the eternal sleep of zombie Jessica and the sleeping Snow White nor alive like Laura or Bardot. She is free to rule the psyche of the 'male' consciousness without worry of clashing with the 'real' thing. In other words, unlike Dana Andrews in Laura, Leo never has to worry about his obsession suddenly coming to life and doing un-anima things like taking too long in the bathroom or nagging him about his drinking and intimacy issues. He can just stay up late and guzzle hooch and stare at the photo of her and maybe some dead children, smiling into the camera behind the artistically cracked glass of the picture frame on his bedstand. This is the ideal state for all lazy males - the dead wife allows all the anima interaction to occur deep down in the dream state, so she can't embarass you in front of your friends. Good luck with that Leo! One day a girl will get too close, and your whole dodgy construct of self will cave in!
Me: What rating do you give him?
During my pregnancy, some of my old tomboy insecurities resurfaced because the damn things were getting bigger again. D-cup sized breasts were the things of most men’s dreams, but my own personal nightmares. I had visions of turning into my middle school chorus teacher – a woman who used her enormous chest as a writing desk whenever she wrote out a hall pass. While it would be handy to never be at a loss for something to lean on should I need to jot down a quick note, the thought of having classroom furniture jutting out from my chest scared the hell out of me. How was I going to nurse an infant with breasts bigger than she was?
We have come along the Algarve coast of Portugal, staying just a few kilometers north of the mass tourism and turned at Sagres to go up the Costa Dourada towards Lisbon.
Q. Is there one word you could use for them both?
However, other research contradicts the notion that certain select people are human diving rods. Psychologists Charles Bond, Jr. and Bella DePaulo ran a large-scale study and found that lie detection is not about the observer but the observee. A person’s perceived credibility plays a strong role in whether someone judges him or her to be deceptive. That’s not necessarily because a person is honest; it’s because they comport themselves in a credible manner. Participants in the study more often believed liars with high credibility ratings than truth-tellers who were perceived as low in credibility. When Bond and DePaul evaluated numerous other studies about deception, they realized that individual differences among judges of deception hovered near the same rate as chance (50%). No one appeared to have an innate advantage. No “naturals” stood out.
Then reduce the heat to medium and simmer until the chicken is cooked through.
How the contest will run:
Ya... that's what I thought.
And in answer to Leslie- you are too kind. I often look at those pictures of stars without makeup and think "hey! That's what I look like without makeup!" It's alright, I just know that to look my best I have to work a little at it. It cracks me up how surprised people are who usually see me without makeup when they see me made up. They literally say "wow! you look so pretty!" To which I reply "It's amazing what a little mascara will do for a girl, huh?!" ;)
Apologies for a being a tad absent at the moment, but life’s been a bit silly and the next stage of editing is beginning, which means I’m off with my head in a story. Meanwhile Operation Bo continues and when we last saw the family, they were down to two chicks – meaning another had disappeared overnight. We think the majority of the chicks were taken by the howling storm that hit the south western Cape on Tuesday night and lasted for two days. It was the worst storm in 30 years, had wind speeds that went right off the graph, and caused massive flooding and destruction. While the storm raged, Bo, much to her indignation, was kept indoors and today was the first day we moved the guinea pig pen, now the guinea fowl pen, outdoors and onto the grass. Although it didn’t stop her from trying to escape, she’s a much happier little bird for being outside. Meanwhile the old dog traveling cage, big enough to house a large Golden Retriever, has been pressed into service as the inside guinea house. It’s high enough to give her space to fly a bit and we’re trying to encourage her to use her wings. As an aside and working on a hunch, I’ve also discovered she’s particularly partial to freshly squished snail…and made a right piggy of herself guzzling it down. The plan is to release her as soon as she has her wings (the sparrowhawk’s forays into the garden notwithstanding) at a time when her family is here. By comparison to the two remaining chicks, Bo remains very small, but she is growing. D reminded me of a bulldog pup his mum bred some years ago – a runt, so tiny as to be pathetic, yet after a year he grew into the biggest bulldog they’d ever seen. I’m hoping Bo will make it to Guinea Queen!
I have used King Tilda…love this stamp and now I have stamped and coloured her I love her even more :o)…….I fancied making a different shape card for a change, and this one was so fun to make and easy too.
I'm Pretty Smitten once again...this time with Society Social. Roxy from the blog My Cup of Te has started her own home and fashion line and all I can say is WOW. I need that bar cart. And that chair!
It’s a perfect layout.
Thank you David for giving us this insight into your work. I am one of those writers whose first ever published story appeared in a Park Publications magazine (Countryside Tales, winter 2004). I can honestly say that it marked a turning point in my life, therefore I really appreciate the value of small press magazines such as these.
Now of course I need to add the disclaimer. We're not in another recession just yet - it is still too early to tell whether we are, at present, suffering another downturn. Moreover there is nothing to suggest that the current crisis in financial markets is going to continue like it was 2008. Markets just might do that, but then again they might not. I'm not going to predict how the markets are going to respond over the coming days weeks and months. Nevertheless I do think that there is enough evidence to show that another market downturn and another recession are going to happen within the next 18 months, and I will stick by that.
MUFE Aqua Eyes 2L
Bless Mary's heart, she had been so busy that she forgot to tell me that
Undershirt: Heatwave Top -Spearmint- 1 Hundred (Kawaii Fair)
Chief Tubbs,
of that haunted house,
Well, this is it. I’ve made a difficult decision about the direction my life is going to go in, and I’m determined to keep to it.
It is fun to imagine.
Check out this link to me and my friends YouTube channel.
Paul is trying to emphasize here that you must acknowledge the fact that Jesus is Lord, but this acknowledgement can’t just be intellectual ascent, it has to lead to a change in your life (i.e. “believe”). But what is “Lord” in the NT?
The much-maligned greengrocer's apostrophe actually has a valid claim to existence in some cases. Researching Renaissance maps for a historical novel, I came across some that marked dangers to look out for - of the 'hereby monsters' variety, but more plausible. Around the Caribbean, the sailor was to look out for Tornado's. There were no other misplaced apostrophes. Do greengrocers sell Tornado's? I think not.
Is that what awaits me?
GAH, and I almost forgot to announce this-- my book Farm Girl has been on a 5-day free promo and today is the last day! If you want one for your Kindle, go here.
The recent spell of wet weather here in southern England has made it easy to forget the prolonged dry spell we'd been experiencing, not to mention the soaring temperatures back in March.
There are two versions.
I’m writing the first draft of the next novel involving my main character, Detective Sergeant Allie Shenton. It’s called Follow the Leader and will be predominantly about a serial killer. It’s especially challenging for me as there are six murders in this one and again, everyone knows everyone, so it’s all secrets and lies.
So I put on a nearly brand new suit with a new shirt and I head on down, arrive early and wait for proceedings. Since I have already done my induction on the original start date of my employment, I am went through the same presentation again. I don’t mind it’s all fair being safety breached and what not. I didn’t expect to have much going on initially.
onto a brush or denim jacket, or Sun-
Roger leads the company with one simple, yet compelling vision: The health and prosperity of people and the planet offer the greatest hope for a better world.
Not a soul in any of the bars or restaurants. Caffé Bise has just 1 patron. Just 3 yachts tied up at the quay. Feels a bit desolate. Maybe time to hang out on the beach next to monastery?
Spiritwalker is the swansong to Astbury's North American tribal influences. Resurrection Joe is a pounding bass-driven six minutes of goth disco energy. The classic She Sells Sanctuary (here in it's original full length mix) bounces and throbs from your speakers, so much so that I thought the needle would jump from the vinyl at any moment - in fact you could almost believe it was mastered in the last decade as all the levels are slid to their max - it's not clipped (it's from a 27 year old record) - if you don't believe me, have a look at the waveform! Revolution tucks it's muddy and black skinny jeans into it's boots and waves a huge big flag at you. It is pompous rebel rock for American radio.
I think, to a certain extent, vulnerability is something that we learn. I mean, some kids are definitely more anxious about things than others, but most of us grow up believing, deep down inside, that we’re immortal. Maybe we don’t exactly articulate it, maybe we don’t even really think about it. But it’s there. And then we get older, and we get hurt, and we get responsibilites. And we realise we’re breakable, realise we’re mortal. So we stop taking risks and chasing rainbows and dancing in the rain and lighting up the horizon with stars and bonfires.
‘If Madame prefers not, it makes no difference,’ replied the officer, hurriedly turning away. .
Peace, joy, love, and happiness to everyone who crosses my path on this ministry of mine,
After I made the first one, the requests for my kids came flying at warp speed. "I want white with a pink tail", "...blue with white", "can mine have green eyes?", "I want one that's brown, green and tan with white eyes" ...
This week we have another great challenge for you...
Compared to Dunham’s Tiny Furniture (2010, made when she was only 23, gulp), Girls is tight — and fearless. I quite liked that film, but this series has an underlying perception and forthrightness about how these girls live that shows Dunham’s growing talent as a writer. Parts of it even feel like a shot across the bow by this gifted writer and young woman, especially given the second episode’s subject matter, “Vagina Panic” — which circles around Jessa’s scheduled abortion as well as Hannah’s STI anxieties.
When David Cameron set the review up he made much of the benefits he saw from introducing a fair use right and cynics detected in this an attempt to appear pro innovation without the government having to do much, in particular not spend money such as through tax breaks. As plenty of commentators said at the time, EU law would not allow this. Hargreaves has echoed that and dismissed the possibility of a fair use law. Instead he has listened and listed a large number of less radical changes government must consider.
If you freeze green grapes, they taste like yummy little popsicles.
. . . toenails painted red - I am boring as hell about this one. I see all the green, blue, and gray toenails out there. Mine are red. They really make me happy.
much music is discussed. Nevertheless, a good use was made
Seriously, leave your shoes behind, you don’t need them.
½ teaspoon grated lemon rind
Our goal is to build better human beings. Perhaps we need to adjust the methods we use to build these beings. I’d like to say that I have memorized the names and years of service for each President of the United States and that I can rattle them off sequentially at will. But I can’t. However, I can find that information in .32 seconds on Google. If I had stayed in Mr. Carey’s AP US History course, then I could follow this up with a witty response to your essay prompt. Times have changed; the way we teach needs to change.
I hope I am wrong on this. I would love to hear your thoughts. Mine are still very much a work in progress.
ANONIEM. What should the recommendations be concerning treatment and job placement for a nursing home employee diagnosed as having influenza? J Occup Environ Med 1996; 38:19-21.
The first thing that I think is notable about community apps like Instagram is that it opens the creative door for people while at the same time providing affirmation. Now, there are a number of photographers out there who decry Instagram as another way for the “me” generation to spew self-centered garbage out into the world. (Disclaimer: the views of those individuals do not necessarily reflect the views of Seeing Spots Photography. And whhhhyyyy? Well, let me tell you!).
We decide to go for breakfast before doing some promotion. The cafe is next to the school and Gary the Goat somehow gets into a classroom. Woops! There follows a heated lecture from the principal who tells us that Gary is a danger to the children. While she is telling us this a dozen toddlers, who are now leaving morning playgroup, are taking it in turns to pat Gary.
Following last month’s reports of a high level of elephant poaching in Virunga National Park, park officials announce the introduction of 5 trained sniffer dogs to the Park’s anti-poaching arsenal. The Park’s first canine assisted operation follows thediscovery of a poached elephant missing its tusks and involves 2 dogs tracking poachers over 7 km in two days. This results in armed conflict with suspected poachers and the recovery of firearms.
where Jeannie catches the Alibaba Flu
07 - Bloody Reunion 04:09
For me, well, I've started a metal working class at the local college and an Indian beading class at the senior center. Come summer, I'm taking a film class--free because I'll be 65. I'm excited and happy, and looking forward to doing all I can before that fateful night comes. My gosh. Why sit around depressed and whining waiting for it? It'll let me know when the time has come.
Remember the great mafia feud of 1915 Russia, between the cunning Skinners and the brutal Argwalla’s? It was the largest, privately funded war in history. One day, JRD Skinner (Old Man Skinner’s favorite grandson) was arrested and put in a room with Rusty Argwalla (Old Man Argwalla’s favorite nephew). After a few tough boxing matches, and after secretly reading each other’s journals for a few weeks, they discovered that the other men were actually human and began to treat each other as such. The war ended 10 days later.
- One of the most significant advances this year has been capturing three county council seats on June 4th. This is a tremendous breakthrough for the Party into an entirely new tier of government and gives us a massive boost of credibility. County council seats are huge and immensely hard to win — the local election equivalent of winning a Parliamentary constituency sized seat.
Well I must head off to work, lots to do and time is marching on, or Apriling on I suppose.
Guest post by Abby Snyder ~
wishing
our hosts thought I might be intrigued, but they had no idea what a chicken I am. Seriously. I left the bathroom light on all night. We never saw anything, thankfully. If we had I would have awoken the entire household. Three wonderful breakfasts (and days of exploring the coast of Maine) later, we packed up and left Maine, my nerves intact.
To please the six people
easy, quick and straight forward. I used chalk to colour the image and then sprayed the image with shimmer spray, which gives it a pearlised look. I added the feather to give the card a light and airy feel.
P.s. This week with a special guest star too... Mhmm... Let me know if you figure him out!
Consolation
Just realized the kids have their two week Spring Break starting March 12th (unless the teachers go on strike before then). Lost a week in there somewhere as I thought I still had two weeks to go. That flu bug really messed me up! Time to start planning some activities and outings along with some spring cleaning the kids can help with, which I'm sure they will be just thrilled to help with - NOT! (insert evil mommy grin lol).
6) If her family and the baby’s father knew that she was not right in her mind, as she was in and out of the looney bin, why the hell did they not monitor her? Why would they leave a woman like her alone with 3 children since the sister is obviously either young or good for nothing?! and most importantly, why did they not make sure she was getting the help she needed?!?!?!
I went to the Tri-Citys (about a 2 hour drive from Spokane.) for a scrapbooking weekend. I have been so STRESSED at work for the last 3 weeks. Our corporate office came in and fired two more people and so now the three of us that are left are doing more work and no pay raise. I have not had time to do any thing in my crafting world becouse by the time I get home I just want to go to bed. But I did have a GREAT weekend! I got 40 pages done in my 2008 book. 2008 was the last year with my dad it is now 2 books thick and I am only in Aug. Here are some of my favorite pages. I have some cut files already posted but have a few more but can't find my thumb drive will post them as soon as I find it. thanks for stoping by.sorry the photos are not that great I took my my phone.
Well, I’ve finished reading My Life in France and The Beach Street Knitting Society and Yarn Club. Both were incredibly excellent books. Julia Child is an amazing person, and definitely a role model for anyone who wants to learn how to do anything new! The story of her life after moving to France is really uplifting and inspiring, and I highly suggest reading the book.
The people in the coach behind us were also at the rally in Winston Salem and have lived here as full time RV'ers. She told me more about Pham, who calls the local cops if he suspects the strangest thing from the residents of the mobile home park on the hill. She says Pham is one in a million and I have already seen that. They sold their home near here and travel between Durham where one son lives and their other son in southern CA and visit family in FL along the way. Her husband is a retired computer program mer and says he picks up odd jobs along their travels to supplement their retirement. She has had medical issues about which she did not elaborate and says she is bound to enjoy life while she has it and do things while she can. Good advice.
elizaapresley: except me (as i have done) follow u on here. i will feel safer if our msgs stay private. ie: i cannot trust others that follow the ones that
My boys were much younger and they napped lots during the day.
Match 3: Lord Tensai defeated Yoshi Tatsu
At present we plan to have a professional choir every other month, which non-professionals have the opportunity to join pending an audition. We would like to train a non-professional choir to sing the chant at alternate monthly Masses. This is a great opportunity to learn how to sing the most beautiful thing this side of heaven. All you have to give is your time.
Shame functions as a filter through which we perceive all incoming data. Comments or looks or actions by others. Things we read. Love offered. A kindness rendered. Its origins lie in sin. Our own sin. The sins of others against us. But as it takes root in our minds, it takes even good things offered us and twists them so that they are perceived as assaults against us. As rejections of who we are. Shame isolates us because it can even render us incapable of receiving love from others and even from the Lord. Listen to this quote taken from the “Psych-central” website:
I think the official description pretty much said it all. It is very lightweight, and has a cream to powder finish. Although on the official website it suggests applying with with your fingers; I find that apply it with a brush/fingers are both easy. I like to apply it with my finger, then blend it with wither a foundation brush or a dual fibre brush.
He said that this equilibrium will end what the government is doing by giving abrupt citizenship to immigrants just to make sure they vote for Barisan Nasional.
I woke up in a state this morning, writing lists of all I have to do in the next week,all the things I have to cancel to fit in an unexpected London trip to attend to Family things, the race to get our house totally empty and clean by Friday , the chaos of unpacking at this end,now we are sleeping in our Old Town Cottage. I was in a state at the small number of Filey Parish people at the Parish Prayer meeting on Monday, and that the new cat flap does not cat flap properly.
Blargh....
"Ha! 50 things to do with my toddler in one day? I get 3 hours in the evening after work with my kid, I'm NOT LISTENING TO YOU!"
As six defendants appealing tickets for speeding on the U.S. 250 Bypass await their day in court, the Charlottesville City Council is considering an ordinance that reiterates the speed limits posted on that stretch of road.
However, I do sometimes stumble upon something new that seems good and worth sharing, and one of these good things is Annie Clark, who records under the name St Vincent. I have no idea what musical genre she falls into - perhaps she falls between several, and that's why I never hear her on the radio. Her voice is very clear and sweet, and her lyrics often verge on the whimsical, but she's never twee: there's something sinister in there too, and the arrangements are often strange, decked out with grinding guitars and bursts of sudden drama. In a way she reminds me a bit of David Lynch - that sense of something strange and twisted lurking behind the white picket fences o' Middle America... except that I always found that deeply boring and predictable when David Lynch did it, and St Vincent is never either of those things.
Such a sky , you never did see!
“Sorry, my lady. Jammed,” he said.
Former Nigerian goalkeeper, Ike Shorunmu lamented the loss saying “It is so sad but the truth of the matter is that our dear Rashidi Yekini is dead”.
· 1/2 cup finely chopped carrots
go outside of Cuba.
We pass small children looking old before their time as they lead donkeys, goats and sheep to new grazing pastures.
De La Soul Me, myself and I US
Luke: Well dad, you kind of killed him...
My mother dated some after the divorce. Her incredibly beautiful and exotic features attracted men like moths to a flame.
Groups like Common Cause and colorofchange.orghave been putting ALEC’s model legislation online and printing the names of its sponsors. They have also published sharp criticism of ALEC’s ideas. This is hardly intimidation. It’s the democratic process at work. A website called alecexposed.org haspublished ALEC’s policy agenda. Common Cause posted the agenda for the meeting of ALEC on May 11 in Charlotte, N.C. The National Board for Professional Teaching Standards has dropped out of ALEC and also withdrawn from the May 11 conference, where it was originally going to be a presenter.
I also hit the jackpot with my own mom. I once heard that the most important thing a parent can do is to listen, just listen, to their children without offering advice or making judgements. That is my mom. I remember when she would come home from work and I would just yak away about what I learned that day, what happened, and how I felt about it. She listened to it all. (I’m pretty sure there were times when she wished I would just be quiet.) As a kid I didn’t feel like I fit in with the rest of the crowd and always felt odd, so her just listening to me made me feel that there was somewhere I belonged. I remember we would hang out with another family, and that mom would just yell at her children all of the time. Everything warranted a yell from her, and every time we left, I thanked my mom for not being her.
He said that he will take steps to get this done but it will take time. He promised me that he will do what he can to get those 2 dolphins moved!!!!!!!!
I have full acceptance
More on fasting: I decided to fast for a week in order to shrink my stomach and start the weight loss process. Boy howdy, was that a good time. I made it six days. And you know what? My jeans were every bit as unwelcoming as they were the day I started.
Next we have Mikuru Asahina. I’ve already pretty much covered her already, but she is a shy and timid girl, and is constantly being subjected to Haruhi’s weirdness. She doesn’t have a say in anything very often unfortunately, but it’s not surprising. Anyway, girls who are being forced to do anything should immediately tell whoever is going it to stop, because doing anything to a girl without her permission is seriously wrong. And it’s still wrong if it is a girl doing it to another girl. The problem is, Japan often uses this to keep the audience interested, but this series is definitely different from that.
They checked me, and got me set up to push with a knotted sheet for me to hold onto. As I pushed, I was to pull myself up using the sheet. I was pushing for less than an hour when I began crowning. I could feel ears and a nose on the sides of the head, and seconds later Shai's head was out. The rest of her body slipped from me in a rush and suddenly I had a tiny, struggling, goo covered baby on my chest. My spouse was beside me, in tears, telling me how much zie loved me and how amazing I was. I was in utter shock. All I could say was "oh baby. Its a baby!" and run my hands over hir. I held hir while I was being stitched up and until zie had to be bathed.
Heat a large skillet over medium heat for 2 minutes. Add 2 tbsp olive oil and then add shallot and garlic, stirring for 1 minute until fragrant. Add crushed red pepper, stirring for 30 seconds. Add broccoli rabe, season with sea salt and freshly ground pepper. Stir to coat well, continue to cook for about 5 minutes, until tendercrisp.
How many children do you have?
Set completion: 488/1500 or 32.53%
She said she wanted to put in her time and effort in each piece of paper, because the paper and the crane represent one of her objectives of the project.
Here are some gorgeous listings whose sales allowed our success:
turns to butterflies.
In explanation of what husband as prophet is to do for his wife, Lepine says,
1A The Insurgent "Miles to Go"
So you know what, I’ll tell you this, Manageurdeath, I don’t know who you are exactly, but I’m going to fucking find out, and WHOEVER you are, mark my words, you have fucked with the WRONG ORC. Enjoy your little podunk swamp town while you can, because I’m telling you right now, somehow, someday, I am going to open up such a can of fucking DISASTER on that place, you and all your little Jainabanging friends aren’t going to know what even fucking HIT you. YOU HAVE BEEN WARNED.
I am a little weird in that I don’t like to snack while I’m writing. I get distracted way too easily and next thing I know I’m eating a whole meal. Plus since I’m a little OCD, I don’t like getting any crumbs on my keyboard! So I try not to eat and write. Let’s just say by the time I finish a chapter, I’m starving!
So here's Roger Green, with the gall to run for the state Assembly seat he was forced to resign from earlier this year after pleading guilty to charges of billing the state for false travel expenses. His conviction just isn't an issue to most people, he says.
I deserve to have gold in my tea!
With all of the questions
I love having the moment of letting a new jewelry piece shine by wearing it at the right time and with the right outfit, the right attitude and the right admirers around to love it. :)
“We knew of someone who bought a single-storey house for RM250,000 and spent about RM200,000 to build a second level. When he sold it, he only got RM300,000,” says Lee.
Made with wheat and pilsner malt, Cascade and Citra hops, orange peel and coriander, Chainbreaker is 5.6 percent alcohol by volume and 55 IBU.
“GOD SAVE AMERICA” C Brewer
We wonder how Mr von Niederhoffentanger met his end. We hope it was peacefully in his sleep like our grandfather and not screaming in terror like his passengers.
Layers and layers
She started a blog, a writer’s blog on treasures she finds at thrift stores & yard sales and what she does with them. Sometimes she shops out of necessity and other times it’s just for fun, but when writing about bargain-shopping there’s never a chance of writer’s block.
The wealthy often intrude on the processes of politics for their own benefit. Their power comes from money itself, and the rest of the population has no countervailing power, which is itself an inherent danger. Some of the wealthy routinely seek control of the very laws and regulations under which their wealth is generated. This anti-democratic tendency is dangerous because favoritism can become implanted in the law. Favoritism in the law differs only in degree from extractive monopoly.
It's a Lightcandle holder card and you can find my tutorial to make it on
The fact that he hasn't shown up in big games and can't make decisions that he can live with is enough for me. The guy just doesn't know what he wants, and he should know what he wants. He should want to win. That's what he should be talking about. Not a Blake Griffin dunk or where he wants to play next. As the ever eccentric and late Al Davis said, "Just win baby". The prince is just not a winner. Not even in a watered down, fundamentally unsound and passionless NBA. Maybe D-Wade can help LeBron get on his stylish coattails.
My last post was about the missing memories of the time between my summers. Diane’s comment made me ask myself if the period in between is something better left forgotten. I have wondered about this previously, and I’m still no closer to an answer. I would like to have at least a few memories that are as close to “normal” as possible. Just a few. That’s all I ask.
Christian admitted to WFTV that he pulled the trigger, but he claimed he did it in self-defense. Christian would only say that Alkattan had threatened him. But the victim’s friends said they don’t believe Christian’s claims of self-defense.
Don’t get me wrong, they might marry some day but I’m sort of leaning towards no… then again, that could be the pessimism coming out.
4. Converse One Star striped shirt, $5.99
* “Mouth For War”
No, we must not work to include the under-represented and the minority communities. We have done enough damage through the lowering of standards for the sake of racial bean counting in law schools, government appointments and public and corporate hiring. To introduce the same into American science research is to drive the lethal spike of malignant lunacy into the realm of empirical inquiry.
Lesson: if you don't have the exact ingredients on hand for a recipe, improvise with similar ingredients. But DO taste the ingredients or mixture of ingredients first before applying them to the entire recipe.
- Crunches (25)
“Not before tomorrow or the day after tomorrow, between 8am and 6pm.”
For several years Happy Times was a successful and productive community. The Board of Directors was comprised of individuals who were successful, business minded and community focused. They understood the importance of debating differing points of views on issues and leaving the boardroom with one unified voice – majority rules and each individual respected and supported that fact.
He says the Iranian people couldn't be more different from their bellicose leader, President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad, who is known for muttering murderous threats towards Israel and threatening to wipe the Jewish state off the map.
5. The Heirloom Life Gardener, Jere and Emilee Gettle,
I've always thought the ubiquitous Graham Crackers were ridiculously hard to make, so I was super excited to finally crack it. In addition, I had never even heard of Nanaimo bars, which is a shame because I live so close to B.C. just hours away.
Last time we spoke you said you were hurting
God, she was gorgeous.
No matter what your goals are... and no matter how out of reach they seem... YOU CAN find a way to make it happen. Make the sacrifice and take the next step toward your goals!
add milk 1 cup at a time and stir out clumps
This quiet love is stealth
Last is a sketch by another of our contributing artists, Lisa Blastic. This is also a very versatile sketch. I loved this idea so much I decided to try a digital layout based on Lisa's sketch. Here is the sketch.
I thought that I would begin with a few more pictures of my
The two girls go to Vannozza’s, and after a little needling, she agrees to help them out. She tells the two gently bred ladies they’re going to have to seriously get their hands dirty. They seem game.
Beware of this Jabra bt 530 sold by ShopCell. It is not the full retail package and does not come with the USB charging cable nor does it come with the extra ear gels.
Just the 3 stamp sets so far - this one I've put up before but I'm trying again. Would love someone to have it and give it a home.
Haiti may be the poorest nation in the Americas. Cuba may have the dictator with the longest lifespan. But Venezuela arguably has the worst government.
I'm assuming that if you're not from Philly or Central PA, you've probably never heard of Irish Potatoes. Or maybe you have (sorry for assuming, you well-informed-blog-reader, you!) Either way, you're in for a Philadelphia-style treat.
I've created a cute little circle card today using my favourite bunny Clementine from StampFairy. I've also tried using my pencils again, trying to give some variation from the copics. It does take me a lot longer to colour, and I'm still learning to get the blending right with the sansodor, but I'm getting better (or maybe I'm just learning which colours blend more easily!!).
Answering a question whether Baloch separatists could achieve their goal through US intervention he said: “Even father of this terrorist will not be able to achieve this goal”. We will free people of Balochistan form the shackles of this Sardars and our children would scarify for the integrity of Pakistan.
Who does not pity the trembling boy?
Before God becomes satisfied with us, He will take everything of our so-called wealth, until we learn that He is our Source; as the psalmist said, “All my springs are in You” (Psalm 87:7). If the majesty, grace, and power of God are not being exhibited in us, God holds us responsible. “God is able to make all grace abound toward you, that you . . . may have an abundance . . .” (2 Corinthians 9:8)— then learn to lavish the grace of God on others, generously giving of yourself. Be marked and identified with God’s nature, and His blessing will flow through you all the time.
However, 9 years later, I am here to say that we have survived. We lived through the trauma, crawled through the rubble, hid in the trenches and sought refuge with fellow survivors.
“Our visit to the Ministry took longer than expected and we had to move forward our appointments with the Swedish National Party and the Swedish Democratic Party. The very youthful politicians and activists of the Swedish National Party are activists who have already dedicated an entire edition of their party-publication to the Afrikaner cause – with articles about our history, the concentration camps, the Great Trek, the Voortrekker Monument, as well as the farm murders and the murder of Eugene Terre’Blanche. Clearly there is at the moment a strong awareness process among Swedish youth and we were astonished about the interest they displayed in our country, as well as the great many requests for more information. “
Having exhausted all my options for identifying the source, I asked Ethel, our empleada, if she smelled the fishy, briny odor that seemed to be surrounding the outside of our house.
EVERY SINGLE CASE CITED was lost, and more, by UKIP - at the expense of the benefits of the members and the credibility of the party!
Hellllooooooo!!! Just wanted to post for you what I've been doing lately, and the monthly PTI Blog Hop seems to fit the bill! I dug out my quilling things about two weeks ago. I haven't quilled in over 20 years! YIKES! So please don't be too critical of my quilling skills - I'm a little rusty!!
Gary Mackay-Steven
If we are to protect our society from despotism and decline, whose counsel should we then cherish? Should we honor thousands of years of human experience and the wisdom of history's greatest philosophers -- Polybius, Cicero, Aristotle, Montesquieu, Locke, Jefferson, Adams and Madison among them? Men who understood the nature of a government's despotic decline and sought to construct a system to counter it?
Thus, the old argument that the indexicality of photography gives us a piece of the event, that it draws us physically closer to the recorded event, because literally the same light is still somehow present, is too easy for the trompe-l'œil artist. In the case of Wolfe, Oshiro, Peto and Harnett, they had no trouble working after photography. It isn’t the representation that matters but what the object and representation mean to the individual. If you believe that the human interaction with things means something, the trompe-l'œil of Oshiro and Wolfe should work for you as well.
Hope you are as excited as me that tomorrow is FRIDAY!!!
I'll be honest, the book had a chance with me up until the big reveal. After the big reveal that was anything but big--you'll just have to trust me, it was a flop, but I don't want to spoil the book in my review--the book just continued to go downhill.
06. Rust Never Sleeps - Neil Young (1979)
We managed polite greetings through our surprise as Jon continued.
Many of us have long looked to alternative news sources for the truer picture of what is going on in world events - myself included. And there has been much revealed there, but it has not included what has been most needed as far as solutions go. This commonality has really caused me to deeply ponder just whose side they're really on. Is it honestly just a matter of not being informed and being deceived themselves - or is it all by clever design ? As I've brought up several times before - are we once again guilty of underestimating our enemies (those who truly hate us) and their reach ? Think about it.
I'm still learning, I still battle saying no to bad stuff, I dont have it all together, but I'm certainly on my way.
Recovery
Commission
I'm not afraid of the murky water at all,
What is my plan –
1 dee
Yours in the missio Dei and in Ecumenical Theological Education
Over the past month or so, I've been working with various authors, publishers, and publicists to coordinate a summer event that I finally get to share with you:
In our quest to create an old family tree we ran across many more of these. I really hope that my mother one day completes her book on her father’s side of the family and I hope her good intentions will not be forgotten in the depths of procrastination…
I had a great time working on the projects this month and getting to know some of the members of the Beading Babes. I also really like my Ravishing Rosettes necklace, and while I thought it looked nice in the magazine, it is not one of the ones I would chosen for myself. So I would have missed out on this wonderful design if I had not joined the Beading Babes group!
Now a picture of the last week a friend of mine shoot. I lo-lo-love it ♥
5, Angels 7.
to be “freshly pressed” (FP) is cool. it means that someone, somewhere, for some reason, thinks that what you wrote is relevant, witty, visually outstanding, poignant, provocative, or any combination, but not limited to, those nice words. it means your thoughts or product will be posted to be seen by the entire wordpress community, or at least those who know about it. i was probably using wordpress for close to half a year before i knew FP existed. as cool as it is, and as cool as i may or may not be, i will never be FP, unless FP stands for “f#cking pr!ck.”
And they came chasing after us.
Y-Youth- What food reminds you of your youth? Spaghetti pie and potato salad and hot water cornbread make me think of my Granny. I loved it when she cooked that stuff. She was a great cook.
Had to think about this! I don't really collect anything but I do have quite a large paper collection, so I guess you could say I collect papers. But then also I guess you could say I collect junk also! LOL! I scour thrift stores for anything that really "speaks" to me at the time, for use later in an assemblage. This picture is only a glimpse :)
The house is always a mess, and it's quite hard for me to handle that- since it seems like I am cleaning up all the time..but as my dear Nan (87) says..."You can't have children without mess."
* 1 cup pecans or walnuts, chopped
It got me thinking – why wait?
Now you need to have a knife, towel, and hot water next to you for this. Take the knife and put it into the hot water for a second, then dry it with the towel. Carefully score the top layer only (chocolate layer). With each score you make, you must warm the knife in the water, then wipe it clean. It is important to do this so that when you cut into the bar, the middle layer of cream doesn’t smoosh out and mess up the whole bar. Trust me, it works great!
The law allowed you build right up to the plot line on your building and then you could rise up to a certain height and then once you reached that height, you had to step back, and then step back again.. There was a formula for how high you could go before you had to set back. The height that you could build up to depended upon the width of the street. On a wide street you could have a street wall that was higher than if you were on a narrow street.
Yes, Paul was fulfilling his apostleship, for God was providing the means so that he could do it. He is also providing the means for you to fulfil your ambassadorship. Are you aware of His leading and reacting accordingly?
So easy! Now I need to do this too. Just think, you could use any color glitter if you wanted pink trees or blue trees...the colors are endless!
GEAUGA COUNTY MAPLE FESTIVAL!!
Knowing her temperament this could be a very long, tense day....
Just a week ago the establishment media was aflutter with news that a CIA double-agent had thwarted a new type of underwear bomb attack targeting U.S. flights in a plot devised by al-Qaeda of the Arabian Peninsula. ...
that final evening,
Wish you were here 5'46
Gastrointestinal disorders
63. Kellys Heels-Playing Into Your Hands (Warm Fuzz)
Sometimes it's tough to sort out all the details related to this subject, but I'm positive you'll have no trouble making sense of the information presented above.
The CFR is controlled from New York by the Maltese Knights of the Round Table. The Archbishop of New York is the leadership behind the CFR. Remember also the CFR was created by the Sovereign Military of Malta. Now also the Archbishop of NY is the leadership of this organisation within the Americas. The CFR control Israel as well as the U.S region.
At that angle, bent over like that, as thin as the ejector is, the alloy it is, as brittle as it gets like that... I'd think it would just bend over further, or break off. It'd have to be in a perfect position, with a soft primer etc...
A cinema of affects must learn from this, it must seeks to suspend knowledge for potential, to show viewers the potential for worldmaking within each and every shot, within ever bit of sound and vision. As Tarkovsky has said, we must feel the pulsing of time in every shot, and if we read this through Deleuze, we can say that we need to be able to see the power of pure difference within each shot, for difference and becoming (not to be confused with more tame forms of time) are two sides of the same. Tarkovsky presents us with a pedagogy and a prophecy in his films, in which each aspect of each image has the potential to give birth to film-aspects and film-worlds to come.
Still only 24, Messi is already Barça’s leading scorer in official games with 248 goals, beating César Rodríguez’s 60-year-old record of 232 in March when he also became the first player to score five in a Champions League match.
Even if Rangers were able to prove that they acted at all times “in good faith”, if convicted on the contracts/payments issue, substantial penalties would be inevitable.
Sometimes it frustrates me that in our society we are expected to ever "get over it". I for sure don't think it is healthy to dwell on it and let us consume us, but largely our heartache and pain make us who we are...to deny it is to deny a part of ourselves. Instead of fearing the pain we need to FEEL it.
Went to visit Jack Hess and he was working in his shop on yet another standard cupola. Suggested we sit on his patio. For the first time mentioned that now he's a Trustee of the City Library Association. I said nothing and let it pass. He asked me a lot of questions but I let nothing special come out. Exact quote from Hess: "I'm on the Board. They want my stuff." He told me how helpful Joe Carvalho was when he first knew him and expressed disgust at the way he turned out.
*Do You Smile often?
True, Celek had 5 fantasy points to Owen Daniels' 3 on the bench, but still I expected more...like at least a touchdown against the putrid Arizona Cardinals. However, Avant was the one who really disappointed with his 0 fantasy points and not to be left out of any of this was Vick who ended the afternoon with 9 fantasy points where he was projected to have 23 by Yahoo (of course, dude had a legitimate excuse with two broken ribs).
You can hardly blame me for the vagueness. It runs rampant in Paris. Just look at "some kid's" birthday invitation, especially the directions on how to find their apartment once inside the building --
Fact; people will end up disappointing you one way or the other. Expectation is the root of all disappointments ergo, no expectations; no disappointments.
One: I am a freak that always thinks I am pregnant. I know I am not the only one- several of my close friends share the same disorder (you know who you are). I have been tired and nauseous (hello last weekend was Thanksgiving) but most of all I could swear that I felt fetal movement! I know- freak! So that begs the question, is there such a thing as phantom fetal movement syndrome? You know, like when amputees still feel pain in the limb that was removed- its' all neurological so it should be feasible that I would still feel movement from my itty one who was essentially part of me for the better part of a year.... so I looked it up. Turns out- I didn't even coin my own term :) Lots of women have this and that is WEIRD! I am going to do more research, the doc in me what to know exactly why it happens and I will post when I know.
Frisch weht der Wind
Mon, 12:20am: Wtf am I doing?? Why am I living so far from home?
As extra sheets were hung;
Ya'll know I've been on a "use what I have" kick lately, & this project is no exception.
There's a broad selection of Burch & Purchese take-home products, but the salted caramel spread is my pick of the bunch. Flecked visibly with fresh vanilla beans, it's sweet, salty and buttery and impossible to resist. It's a jar filled with the caramel centres from your favourite chocolate box.
These are the hands that will work alongside yours, as together you
The Remington 870 is the ultimate 12-guage pump shotgun - every lawman & warrior knows that; the NBC campaign is not directed toward us; it is directed toward other liberals and their political tools in Washington. Nonetheless we must always counter their anti-gun propaganda.
This means that the S III offers a more familiar experience, while the One X can be used the way Ice Cream Sandwich was meant to be used. But both phones feature extensive modifications to the interface, so the experience is unlike that of any other maker.
When criticized for the remarks, Marcotte deleted them from her website. As other groups pored through Marcotte’s writings, it turned out she was an equal-opportunity author of vile material, and soon thereafter she resigned from the campaign.
Phew. Now, what to do?
The TNG move franchise definitely ended on a sour note. Of all four movies, First Contact is the only one I can ever see myself voluntarily sitting through again. Even then, I am only marginally enthusiastic. I do not feel there is a great sense of finality here even though the fate of several characters is set. Why, if you are going to send beloved characters off into the sunset, do you and the movie over to a director who knows nothing about them? It is going to result inexactly what we got-- an unsatisfying movie that limps to the finish line. It is highly disappointing, but still a notch above the illogical mess that is Insurrection, but that is not saying much.
Sate Torpedo ( Testicles Satay )
Miranda, a misfit girl from the island's most infamous family, and Phillips, an exiled teen criminal who hears the voices of the dead, must dodge everyone from federal agents to long-dead alchemists as they work to uncover the secrets of the new Lost Colony. The one thing they can't dodge is each other.
I'm not a big fan of the egg custard, but I wanted to give this recipe a go. I made 1/4 of the recipe and that filled three mini-ramekins.
Juliet is singing “It’s a Man’s World” tonight. I’m a bit surprised… I haven’t been enjoying her voice for the most part, but this song and arrangement is really working for her. Wonderful job- everyone is stepping it up tonight.
I have no need for small-talk or fleeting, cheap sentiments whilst I'm deep within here,
She apologized for calling at such a late hour but wanted to contact me ASAP as she had just received a message from Tokyo offering me an early departure spot to you guessed to KOBE CITY!!!
Well, for me great films are art. And art is healing and workable and central to a community. I am a highly artistic person, intensely creative, and very much dedicated to the craft. For me, being involved with film is a way to celebrate and preserve expression, beauty, and culture. It’s also a tremendous amount of fun and a very exciting process.
Eye Candy 5 Textures
Another kind of contest with a hidden moneymaking agenda is conducted by fee-charging publishers. These contests focus on unpublished authors, and since entry fees are small or nonexistent, and prizes often involve a promise of fee-free publication, they can seem very attractive. Beware, though: the contest may be mostly, or partly, a way for the publisher to gather a pool of potential paying customers.
paint all doors black
"Relvin-" Taslin's voice lacked its usual sharp edge, but he wouldn't have stopped for her even if she'd tried Compulsion on him. Long, stiff strides carried him down the street towards the dark shape of old Vessit while he tried to get his riled breathing under control. Dora had no right to talk about him like that and in the state she was in, she could hardly be relied on in the upcoming confrontation.
11 – Lodz Sportshall, Lodz, Poland (Pat O’Brien, guest guitarist)
My mother never allowed me to play organized sports. It's a regret that I will carry forever. However, She could not stop me from playing intramural everything. Ultimately, the benefit of intramural soccer was dehydration and smooth flowing beer after kicking around a ball for an hour. These days, as I have turned assisted fast pitch and baseball coach I mow the fields for a dugout ticket and this year state playoff tickets were included for both teams.
Summit County Sheriff’s Deputy Dominic Martucci, 35, was initially suspended, and then fired for mistreating the inmates and having a cell phone in the jail. Martucci blasted Usher’s “Yeah!” from his phone, and called other deputies over to watch the inmates’ forced dance moves, the Beacon Journal reports.
No? It's just me? Well, this is one of those posts. Be forewarned.
and Sacrifice, mediating the New Covenant at every Eucharist. As comparison of Romans 12:1 shows us, there is a kind of offering, a “presenting” appropriate for living sacrifices, that is, Christians in this verse. And the same Greek root, paristemi, is used in Romans 6:13 for our self-offering of life out of death. But here it is said to be modelled on Christ being dead to sin but alive to God in verses 10 and 11. Therefore, our ongoing paristemi-offering is based on Christ's. Christ's prosphero-offering at the Cross, involving suffering and death, the one specifically described in Hebrews as “once-for-all”, has ceased. But he remains a self-presenting living sacrifice. His “appearing” (cp. Hebrews 9:24) before the face of God is of itself enough to make Him our immortal Sacrifice and Priest.
steps and sad
By the summer of 1979, I'd spent a few miserable post-high school years living the very things the Clash sang about- being bored, working a series of go-nowhere jobs, loving rock 'n' roll, feeling alienated, getting stoned, lacking social status, and (most-profoundly) jail guitar doors- just like, except for that last one, several million other dumb American kids (so why were they all listening to Toto, Benatar and Breakfast In America and not THIS?). The contrast to Give 'Em Enough Rope (released six months prior) was extreme, and not just because of Sandy Pearlman's big and slick production (someday we'll need to take a closer look at that one; it definitely isn’t the Sophomore Slump). A comparison of the two puts the former into perspective, but requires it's own juxtaposition with the original UK release.
At U’CHIQUE Body Sculpting we make use of Ultra sound and Radio frequency equipment to help you to reduce the appearance of lines and wrinkles in the frown area, forehead, crow’s-feet, the mouth area and your neck. Our treatments also help to create symmetry by lifting the eyebrows and help to tighten your skin to help with asymmetrical lines that start to form on the rest of your face and chin line.
Minister: Right, do that then. Anything else? Could we extend execution to other serious crimes?
The following is going to sound like conspiracy BS. It is not. The technology, and corrupt morals are available, and developed sufficiently in Canada.
And blindly follow those traditions
Geez, what am I going to review until then?
I’ve got grow up friends who have seen ghosts, spoken to them (and got replies). The fact that I haven’t doesn’t make them wrong either. It doesn’t make their experience less valid. I haven’t seen one and I know nothing about such things. My experience proves nothing about the subject.
I am not sure how consistent my postings will be over the next week or so, as I am dedicating my time to working on the zine. However, regular posts will begin again soon. Over the run of The Pulse, I have "collected" so much to show and so much to say. So stay tuned! And thank you all once again!!
“I feel sooooo much better!” my happy boy said as he lay down.
Spirit of hours I knew, all hectic red one day, but pale as death
14. “Peyton’s Place”: JJS’s house in North Carolina is used for a score of episodes in the teen melodrama One Tree Hill. A funny read.
Geez. I am officially now one of the cool kids from my kindergarden class!
Last week we rode twice. Tuesday was a bareback ride, working on steering and stretching out my hips. A nice, easy, calm, ride.
Anna came aroundfirst thing, and we visited Preston Market (open Wed-Sun) so that I could fill my empty yearning cupboards with fresh produce. She showed me around, took me to incredible dumplings (One Noodle Friendship – so fresh they make them in front of you, and as cheap as the famous Shanghai Dumpling on Little Bourke Street!) and I filled my grandma wheely-hamper that Anna had kindly bestowed apon me with all kinds of things from many stalls.
Start Date: May 15, 2012
Try lowering your voice instead of raising it. Imagine the impact on the child of hearing the parent gently say, “If the trash is not taken out in the next five minutes, I will put the video games in storage for a week.” If a parent yells this, it sounds threatening. If, on the other hand, it is said in a matter-of-fact tone, the child receives the message, “Do as you will. I’m not going to battle with you. I trust you know the consequence for not complying.”
If you want to see anything worth watching supporting autism then watch/read Temple Grandin, but don’t think for a minute because you have watched ‘Rainman’ you think you know everything there is to know about autism, autistic spectrum disorder covers many diversities, every day a parent of a child on the spectrum learns something new, every second, minute, hour, day, week, month, year, the child will show you that they can get through a milestone you as a parent/parents never thought or were told they would never do.
SO you’re basically witnessing an experiment here on the blog. I’m going to try and see what’ll happen from leaving out the plastic.
Okay, so Steve’s idea was better, and this probably isn’t the greatest idea, but it did work for about 2 minutes, which was 2 more hand-free minutes that I wouldn’t have had before.
Boots ASOS White, Clutch Reiss, Dress Topshop, Belt BCBG Max Azria, Cardigan vintage MaxMara from eBay and Hat Philip Treacy.
There are a lot of bold, insecure and simply selfish people out there today who do not respect other people’s relationships and partners. They (usually women) will often go out of their way to prove they are desirable by flirting with someone else’s man right in front of them. Often times it’s done for a competitive edge and for ego building. Either way it doesn’t matter what SOMEONE else is doing b/c that cannot be controlled to a certain degree – it’s always left up to your partner to show no interest in feeding into that. Yes it’s flattering to be desirable to others whether you are in a relationship or not. But it should not reach levels of outright feeding unless you are the kind of person who depends on others validation to feel completely desirable to your partner. The problem is when a person who is in a relationship feeds into other people who are flirting with them who know they are in a relationship or even better knowing their SO is standing right there with them. It is the job of the person in the relationship to halt that in some manner if their partner is being put in an awkward situation.
My daughter looked up and smiled. I smiled. It’s always nice when a stranger is kind.
"But I couldn't be talking to him when I haven't talked to her. That just looks so wrong!" I defended myself.
James and Lisa are such wonderful, fun, loving people. The kind of people you instantly take a liking to and feel as if you’ve been friends forever (you’ll see a glimpse of that in the photo’s).
Gendered international migrations
GINGRICH: OK. All right.
A. I've heard a lot of great advice like "write every day" and "don't ever give up" but that advice didn't stick with me. I'd say for me, the best thing to learn was that there are highs and lows when writing a book and even more on the road to publication and you have to savor the highs and let them inspire you, and let the lows roll off your back.
The story starts off with Jack Lemmon as an obvious boozer who starts to date Lee Remicks “dozy lass” character. On the first date, he’s knocking back whiskey from a bottle in his coat pocket. She isn’t a drinker but he gets her on the booze with a chocolate cocktail. They marry, have a kid, and both sink a lot of booze. This leads to her burning down the apartment when drunk and him losing a series of jobs after getting the sack from his executive PR job. At this point I almost turned off. It appeared to me a run of the mill flawed morality tale about weak characters fucking up their lives. The bloke was obviously a controlling drunk to start with, she a weak willed dope that should have thought twice about him on the first date. But as I was halfway through, I continued. The film got slightly better before falling off a cliff into the realms where it was impossible to suspend disbelief. To engage in a film you have to accept what is occurring, essentially to believe and engage with the plot, even if it involves crap with aliens with pointy ears. At least temporally for the duration of the film. I could believe the point where Jack Lemmon sees his own reflection in a window, decides he’s a bum and rather than go into the bar he goes home and talks to his wife. I could believe it when they go and live with her Dad, go on the wagon and life looks up. I liked the bit where he walks into the kitchen and his father in law is having a beer, offers him one and he declines, instead going up to his wife to secretly get drunk. At this point the film was subtle in the points it was making and more effective for being so. He then ends up in a straight jacket in a looney bin, and a young Quincy from AA offers him help, which he takes. A looney bin? That happened quickly. Really? The drama fell off a cliff at that point. I accepted early doors that I was watching a propagandistic morality tale, but that for me this was the point where we found out the pointy eared alien was half human, begging the question how 2 species from 2 planets can mate, when we know that 2 species from the same planet cannot mate even if closely linked in an evolutionary sense. My belief could not be suspended and the film fell apart. Quincy saved it slightly as the AA guy, helping our main protagonist with a character that served to narrate the proceedings with his actions.
Happy Saturday all! The scale is headed back in the right direction for me. Phew! I won week-1 of the fat loss challenge I am doing with an office friend and I am back on track with kettlebells, weights, running, etc. Feels good! I have a super-duper-crazy two weeks ahead. I hope I can keep it up!
Oh, don’t make Sarah pout
Its 50, yes, you hear me correct. Big Five Zero. 50.. grrrrrrrrrrrr
1/2 lemon (squeezed over top)
Yesterday I took myself for a walk down Haight Street (which is easy to do since it's the closest neighborhood to mine).
147 days
The word “normal” should be removed from our dictionaries, as it’s the root to all the discrimination and social prisons out there.
A : Yes, by his own admission.
Wan Kean is an old friend from Bukit Bintang Girls’ School. We kept in touch after school and got our diving certificates together, spending many a weekend swimming with the fishies off Malaysia’s east coast.
Hmm, who would I rather have search for a bloodied murder weapon in my backyard? My children or the K9 dog? Tough one...
I don’t begrudge the Americans having the reputation for the finest imperial stouts nowadays, but I have always found it very weird that so little was brewed in the country where it was invented.
This has to be one of the most used clichés in the book: the hero/heroine is trapped in a nightmarish world of dreams, they’re just about to be killed/see their loved one die when they bolt upright, gasping for breath, in obvious distress. Occasionally, the director will spice up the cliché by putting the camera right in the actors face. However it’s done, virtually every horror/psychological thriller will feature at least one. See: Bram Stoker’s Dracula, Hackers, Moulin Rouge
Is truly tangable
After my long morning at court, I decided to crank up the music and enjoy my good mood drive to work, when I came to a light that was turning yellow and not leaving me much time to make it through.
An application letter in English (signed by both partners) indicating that they want to marry in Tanzania with the intended date of marriage
And it's so freaking cute in person. The lamp shade on the outside is solid, so when its off it's just that burlap showing...but when you turn it ON....
If you are looking for a historical christian romance story, this is the book for you! Melanie Dickerson weaves a captivating re-telling of a classic fairytale. You find yourself hurting when they hurt, cheering for them in their triumphs and fearing for them when they are afraid. You will come away asking yourself if you judge others based on their appearance or on who they truly are on the inside. A great look into the life of the middle ages in England, The Merchant's Daughter shows how different life was then, and how rare it was for someone to actually have access to a Bible.
Sarah Pekkanen may be one of the relatively newer voices on the scene but she’s also one of the hottest. Her first book, The Opposite of Me, was so well-received, it caught the attention of author Jennifer Weiner. Word of mouth and a little contest to help spread the author love, and The Opposite of Me was noted in People, Redbook, USAToday. Sarah was all over the place, and after reading The Opposite of Me, it was no wonder. I fell in love with Sarah’s writing. Truly stories I wanted to tear through, but didn’t want to see end.
** Pun most definitely intended!
6.) F4 notebooks
The rapid-fire clatter of horses’ hooves made her look up, just in time to see James racing down the road in his open buggy. Even from this distance, his urgent posture and focus on the road told Abby he wouldn’t be attending the church service.
Some of you are from New York or moved there for the right reasons, sorry to you guys, but admit it, you got at least one friend who you were like “why the fuck is she moving here, she’ll end up in Brooklyn eating week old pizza and mad DJ Dubstep isn’t returning her texts and then admitting she misses home and should focus on her career”.
They’re settling.
8th April -The Wheatsheaf, Oxford (with Stubb, Trippy Wicked, Desert Storm)
GO CATS! GO REDS!!!
What can I say, I love beads and four-legged boxers! All our boxers came from homes that no longer wanted them for a variety of reasons... "getting married and she has a dog too"..."we got one dog too many" and "I got the dog for my daughter as a birthday gift but she does not take care of him", so we (my husband Mike and I) take them and we love them!
Those were all $3 or less other than the root riser, which was $10
Jesus reached for the bean, slipped and his hand fell on the bean, which squashed it out of shape.
The Second Doctor, Jamie and Zoe give the newly formed UNIT a helping hand dealing with the Cybermen.
Fort building...
So what does that leave me with? Summer? In Virginia? With frizzy hair, mosquitoes, humidity, and kids playing in the street late into the night, but not my kid? Of family vacations with one extra space in the room, on the couch, and at the table?
I am glad that the temperature has gone up a little. It was freezing there last week: -17C (1.4F) and -30C (-22F) with windchill. Brrrrrr.... For someone who's used to wearing tank tops and flip flops in the winter months, that's DEFINITELY more than I can handle! But I love snow in the winter, so I guess that's the sacrifice! I am sure it's beautiful there... will post some photos soon! :)
Congratulations to you, Hilde. We are very glad that you got to play along with us. To claim your prize (two digis from Sassy Cheryl's shop), just email Sassy Cheryl, our fearless leader. She will get you all set for a shopping visit to her store. Happy coloring.... we look forward to seeing you in our upcoming challenges.
We have a closet in our kitchen that houses counter-top appliances, lesser-used dishes (wine glasses, punch bowl, cake platter, etc), and craft supplies. I have been wanting to cull the craft supplies for a long time, but it seemed such a daunting task that I kept putting it off. Plus, if I try to do it with the kids around they'll watch me like hawks as I try to throw things away and say, "But I love that picture of the turtle I drew 2 years ago that fell behind the craft drawer and I haven't seen since the day after I drew it and had completely forgotten about until just now and I can't believe that you don't understand how precious that is to me. You're so mean." Well, they may not say that exactly, but something pretty close. (It was more likely a picture of a dog.)
It is 7 pm and Dustin had only enough energy to share dinner with me tonight. He is now asleep, a restful sleep I pray, after the many nights of tossing and turning with nausea and pain. I close the door to his peacefulness and wander aimlessly down the hall, but I can't even make it to the couch before the nightly tears come. The house is empty, there is no laughter, no random hugs. Only the soft glow of our Christmas tree warms the room.
I'm deep in the well, I'm in the rat trap town.
walking my circles, and defining my pentagrams, hexagrams and sphere of influence/reality. Salutations would be done, followed by invocations of the cardinal’s overseers. Then, simply stillness and release. It wasn’t a few days before I began sitting at the mouth of the old well after performing my ritual. I wanted just to be with the land and its wild life, curious about the abundance of those shy and reluctant, but always blinking eyes. From the first time I sat at the opening of this well, I could sense the presence of our local Undines working in the watery realms directly below me — however, these were not the ones with the eyes in the woods.
The one right after I'd moved back to Austin with my fiance. We had another couple over, and between the four of us, we cooked up an amazing feast. While we were in the kitchen cleaning up after dinner, our Siberian Husky made off with the turkey carcass that was still on the dinner table and had a feast of his own. We'd smoked enough pot to think it was hilarious.
My sweet Rylee came and spent the night with us last night! It is such a treat when we can get her one on one! WE will do the same with Bentley but last night was her special night! We will all be together tonight having a big Spaghetti and Meatball dinner! It is definitely one of our favorites! I am going to also make some bruschetta! The best thing about this bruschetta is that I can go out on my back porch and pick the basil FRESH! IT IS SOOO YUMMY!
Here are my books. Some I already had checked out and some are new:
Whatever. Mildred has a plan to start putting a bit of money aside every month so she can get Veda the piano she totally doesn’t deserve by the following Christmas. She makes him promise not to tell Veda anything about it, then she drives off to some hoity-toity polo match in the lush countryside, where she finds Veda giggling with Monty and his horse amongst the well-heeled polo patrons. Throughout the scene, the Roosevelt “The only thing we have to fear is fear itself” speech is being read.
Nonetheless there still seems to persist in some minds the view that two groups as antagonistic as the Nazis and the Communists or the Fascists and the Communists just cannot have been ideological blood-brothers. Let me therefore try this little quiz: Who was it who at one stage dismissed Hitler as a "barbarian, a criminal and a pederast"? Was it Stalin? Was it some other Communist? Was it Winston Churchill? Was it some other conservative? Was it one of the Social Democrats? No. It was none other than Mussolini, who later became Hitler's ally in World War II. And if any two leaders were ideological blood-brothers those two were. So I think it is clear that antagonism between Hitler and others and between Mussolini and others proves nothing. If anything, the antagonism between Hitler and other socialists and between Mussolini and the "Reds" is proof of what typical socialists both Mussolini and Hitler were.
all of the disciples
As he said it, the bad-news pager brightened. A black male, shot, an address in Springfield Gardens near JFK airport, and the description "likely to expire."
The first-grader at Sable Elementary School in Aurora is accused of sexual harassment and disrupting other students, according to a letter the school district sent to the boy's mother after he was sent home Wednesday.
for the fact that I won't be seeing my Edith.
I would guess Netflixs is computerized. I can hear the conversation going something like this. Please state the genre' of movie you are wanting. Please speak clearly into the phone. If you want an adventure movie say "adventure movie". Drama...Did you say comedy? Please say yes or no. No.... What did you say? I said DRAMA... I'm sorry I don't understand you. Please speak clearly into the phone. I SAID DRA.A.MA.A...I'm sorry let's try this another way. For an adventure movie please press "1" now. For a comedy movie please press "2" now.......Geez! I'm sorry I can't understand you. Please hold for a customer service representative (meaning a live person).
We’ve been gearing up to making some more lately. It’s getting harder to distinguish one president from the other, so we numbered them and put their names in the bottom so we can learn them better. We’ve been reading about them and trying to find something special about them so we can make a ‘wooden peg president’ different from the other ones. But it’s getting harder to make them look different enough. A fun challenge.
This year I watched in awe as I saw people fill Tahrir Square in Cairo and demand a government answerable to them.
He is due to give evidence as a witness in the theft trial next week.
…all resolved, come what might, to believe anything, however preposterous, to overlook anything, however villainous, to approve anything, however obscurantist and brutally authoritarian, in order to be able to preserve intact the confident expectation that one of the most thorough-going, ruthless and bloody tyrannies ever to exist on earth could be relied on to champion human freedom, the brotherhood of man, and all the other good causes to which they had dedicated their lives. (275-6)
We then traveled to the local fertilizer and pesticide/herbicide store in order to show us how the farmers purchase their products and how they translate to the US products. We found them to be very similar; in fact their main fertilizer for potato production is NPK or 17-17-17. The fertilizer is affordable as the government regulates the cost so that the prices are not driven up on the farmers. In order to sell the fertilizer the manager must have a license and they are trained on how to apply and use the product. The manager then informs the farmers in his area. The manager had found the funds to build his own DLS facility, and although it was not done, you could see it was a very useful facility for him. He rents land so he can grow potatoes every year, thus he needs to have varieties that are safe and stored well. He currently needs one ton per acre of potatoes in order to have a successful crop, and the DLS holds 12 tons of potatoes.
If I’m still stable in 6-8 weeks I will stop the medication again…but now is not a good time for me to fall.
And when we do it for long enough, we build a prison for ourselves.
Make sure to check out the SSD blog for the rest of the team and our guests’ cards!
But I took a chance and brought it to the farm.
The Spirit of the Sovereign Lord is on me, because the Lord has anointed me to preach good news to the poor. He has sent me to bind up the brokenhearted and release for the darkness for the prisoners and proclaim the year of the Lord's favor and the day of vengeance of our God, to comfort all who mourn and provide for those who grieve in Zion.
Yes? She hums her praise louder.
Jesus warned: “Be careful not to practice your righteousness in front of others to be seen by them. If you do, you will have no reward from your Father in heaven” (Matthew 6:1).
seat and seat stays, rear brake bridge and under bottom bracket.
And the warmth of her smooth skin?”
a stimulation here
"The party I enjoyed most, recently, was my first party in my Atlanta home. Ginger Rogers was in Atlanta for the first time so she was guest of honor. I invited forty of my friends in Atlanta for a seated dinner. I had five tables of eight and I named each one after a Ginger Rogers film. One table was 'Top Hat,' one was 'Flying Down to Rio,' etc. When my guests arrived, each was given a card with the name of his table. Then during the evening, Ginger moved from table to table, starting with 'Kitty Foyle.' "
Trippin out
They also took the family's Mazda 6 vehicle - registration VVS239GP, he said.
Does he look like one of the birds that sang to Mary Poppins?
That is really all that is going on.
I am fortunate to be living a story worth telling. It is worth telling because of the people I meet, and what they teach me. It is worth telling because of the authentic work that we do and how it can bring real value. It is worth telling because I know all of us are striving to live that kind of life where we can empower and bring more meaning to our existence.
Finally, the moment of aloneness ended. Someone posted on The Post Punk Kitchen forums that they made the above dish, and like me, they like chillies, and like me, they found it insanely hot - like Vindaloo. I finally felt vindicated, like I belonged somewhere, like there were other chilli-sooks like me who thought they liked chillies, but were wrong, and were forever doomed to be alone, listening to Tori Amos covering Judy Garland's "Somewhere Over The Rainbow", whilst crying into our super-mild Indian takeaway. But no. It was not to be. Finally, someone clarified something.
My sewing suffered as I did a ton of knitting for the issues...but my sewing is now in focus for a bit ...i have joined a couple of bees, and a couple of swaps, and found a group of ladies who understand my wit, and creative mojo. (you know who you are!)
As Salam Alaikum friends. Hope your day is going well and that you are blessed.
At kegging after two months in a carboy, the beer was such a beautiful ruby color. The clarity was unbelievable it had to be finished. It only dropped another 2 points in that time. I think the yeast is done. The taste that I had from the gravity sample was a touch too sweet. Since then I've had a taste and I think this may be OK. I may have to blend it into Monkenstein again, but maybe not. I'm leaving this one in a keg but in the closet. Let's see if the yeast might push this a touch more. As high in ABV as this one is, a bit more aging won't hurt.
Mmmm Hmmmmm..... a deep dish apple pie. Have you heard, pies are the new cupcakes. Yeah... they're all the rage. Big ones, little ones, medium ones, pies on a stick, hand pies. The skies the limit with a great crust. Then fill it with what you love. I haven't met a pie I didn't like. Raspberry is my absolute favorite!
Abie and I had so much fun working on this sketch together. I hope we can do this once a week or at least once a month together.
“The small protests by secularists, anarchists, atheists and Catholics who dissent from the Pope caused some minor incidents, albeit some grotesque, such as the group of lunatics who were seen throwing condoms at a group of girls who … prayed the rosary with their eyes closed,” he recalled.
1 tbs pepper
- 2 cups dried fruit/candied peel
I have decided that I want to try and fight the day to day diffuculties that life throws at me and try and live. Even if I relapse every so often and self-harm again I will fight to stay alive. I have survived 2 suicide attempts. I am aware that I may not be so lucky next time. So I have decided that I want to help those around me to help me get better. So I will tell people when I am upset and try not to beat myself up for it as I feel like a burden. I will also try and see what the community mental health team have to offer – treatment wise as I am desperate now.
He charged, strictly warned them: The Greek is epitimao, the same word used in commanding demons and raging storms. Jesus absolutely ordered the disciples not to speak of Him as messiah to outsiders.(France)
your eyes on the road
It is in pardoning that we are pardoned;
The Complaint also alleged that Qualcomm ignored its FRAND commitment to the ETSI and other SDOs by demanding discriminatorily higher (i.e., non-FRAND) royalties from competitors and customers using chipsets not manufactured by
I framed the pendant with antique brass finish filigree and Vintaj components. Keeping to the floral/garden theme, I added Czech glass roses, Vintage Rose Swarovski crystal bicones and Swarovski Sand Opal Rounds, and tiny, luminescent glass seed pearls. I also added Vintaj Natural Brass floral end caps, a bail created from Vintaj's Fanned Trellis filigree embellishment; and created a chain using Vintaj Blossoming Duet fastenables.
Open the doors of today before tomorrow is gone.
Salamander Energy plc, Crude Oil Production, by Country 15
” Nitta Arata is a typical 21 year-old junior attending college of science and engineering at Toaru University. He is bright, he’s in the engineering program after all, but he definitely is from a working class background. He has been working his way through college for the past 3 years without major incident, so being swept up in a warped experiment of an equally warped professor was the last thing he expected in the second half of his college days.
Greetings from Jakarta: Postcards of a Capital 1900-1950 is the most comprehensive visual record of Jakarta ever published covering the first half of the twentieth century which was also the last half century of colonial rule. Four hundred and sixty postcards from the author's own collection are brought together here to reveal a city that has largely vanished and is barely recognizable even to most life-long residents. Three hundred and sixty-two of the postcards have individually researched captions and are linked to period maps which enable the reader to identify the precise location of the each image.
We have tenants in there now, and they're such a sweet, cute couple. Army Lady and Mr. Dad, two little girls, and a baby on the way in a few months. My favorite part of the real estate biz is providing a good place to live where a family can be happy and make memories.
“Iron mining has the potential to bring thousands of jobs to Wisconsin, principally to Northern Wisconsin, whose economy has been particularly hard hit in recent years” Treasurer Schuller said. “The regulatory changes proposed in AB 426 would maintain reasonable environmental safeguards that are specifically tailored to deal with the type of mining the region is able to support. We owe it to the people of Wisconsin to pass this bill.”
We must find a way to elect *Private Individuals* into public office, so they can adopt real world solutions- especially restoring our lost liberties, protecting our individually earned income (to be spent in the private sector) and re-establishing that the government’s only purpose for existing is to protect our rights. Please review the Bill of Rights, One link to the Bill of Rights is HERE that is the first ten amendments to the constitution and the Preamble to the Bill of Rights, for a quick summary of how far gone we are.
First thing's first, we have added occupational therapy to Amelia's routine. She will now be attending twice a week. They will be working with her on her fine motor skills and life skills. We had her assessment last week and I immediately liked her new therapist. I told her Amelia had no stranger danger and she need not be so cautious with her. Having said that I practically threw her into the woman's arms and immediately Amelia looked at me over her shoulder and did the slow motion crumple face cry. I nearly died! The new therapist's approach is to have mom in with her during the session and we will be given pointers on skills she would like us to work on at home.
This was a great shop since it was mostly food/snack/coffee stuff that we use. I'm planning to put the chocolate bars in with MrSmith's Father's Day gift tomorrow, and the coffee will become part of my kids' end-of-year gifts.
Farhad:
*Wednesday*
(2) Once you are happy with your printer settings, print out the rest of the PDF file.
Hi everybody, what a beautiful day - I hope the sun is shining wherever you are. I'd like to say hello and welcome to my new followers and to say hello to the followers that have been with me for awhile, I really do appreciate you wanting to follow me.
Thirty five minutes later the pizza arrived with a side of super spicy buffalo strips that I know no one else in the house will eat (okay, Sadie and Mae both love spicy, so they actually probably would... but they aren't the ones who go through the fridge at 5 a.m. while studying for finals so they're easier to keep tabs on).
Do realize all of these images are copyrighted and may only be used in conjunction with the day you sign up for connected to my blog. These may NOT be edited or used in any other way, ever. Sorry that I have to say that, but i had one of my projects submitted to a magazine and it was published- With someone else's name on it.... It was the same card, same paper, same cricut cuts.... there was NO adaptation at all it was a 100% COPY of my work.... Boo :( but that is life I guess. Yes Erica's Craft Room is Copyrighted and trademarked to ME, I cannot believe no one had copywrighted it before me. I fully make 100% of my graphics and I do not use ready made clip art. I start with a blank screen and build from there, so these are 100% originals, again please do not change them in any way. Thank you!
There are of course a lot of possible variations to games. A few more variations include:
“But what then?”
Dear Universe: WTF already?
At the home of these new friends we experienced a whole new level of tension-free living. Of relaxed relationships between kids and parents. Of the kind of ease and mutual support most families I know would love to bring into their lives, if only it didn't meant giving up a lot of deeply held beliefs about how things are supposed to be.
Here they are after two coats! (please disregard the paper towels under them...we couldn't wait to see how they were going to look on the console table but I was worried they weren't 100% dry. Oh, and the plastic that is still on the lampshades; we hadn't gotten to taking that off yet...oops. The lampshades are from Target, but are not listed online.)
They are very creative with food here. I had leftover chicken from last night and I was going to eat it for breakfast so it didn’t go to waste, but the maids stopped me and they are creating something special and unique, using the same chicken! Besides that I’ll have something, I forget the name, but it’s a thin pancake with ham and cheese and folded like a taco. I’ve always loved all kinds of food (except anything with cow stomach in it or other bi-products) and eating, and I’m fortunate that my high metabolism keeps me from gaining too much weight. I’m lying on a bed now looking up at a rotating ceiling fan and Spanish roof and waiting for two smiling faces to present me with their culinary creation. I just can’t remove thoughts of my past attempts to pry into the mind and heart of another to see if anything remained there for me. Every response was a “no” and I had to finally accept it. Another response could have shifted everything I think, but everything happens exactly as it should.
Laura may kill me if she sees this, but it's hilarious. Zooey jumped up on the roof and couldn't figure out how to get back down. Life is made up of small moments, mostly. NB: Zooey normally never meows. To get a meow out of her means that something is important. To get repeated meows like this means that she is FREAKED OUT.
What are the answers? Yum Yum can't afford to hand out free freezers any more than small publishers can afford to pay the promotional prices asked by bookshops. Nor can big publishers afford to pay the "added value" mark-up on every title they publish. I heard over ten years ago from a major publisher who did not want to be quoted that this could amount to £1 per copy.
I strolled back to my car and waited for my son's interview to finish. Two and a half hours had elapsed before he finally got back to my car. He was cautiously optimistic that a job may come from all of this. He will be informed within two weeks.
Throughout our lives, if we are fortunate, we encounter a number of opportunities to share a loving connection to another human being. For some of us, the essential experience we seek is the commingling of souls–the sharing of genuine love and affection. For others, it is more visceral and temporal in nature, with appropriate sensuality complementing emotional connections. But every once in a while, we experience the “perfect storm,” of love and affection and sensuality. It is just this sort of connection that points to the existence of empathy as the quintessential human trait, which combines the visceral and temporal with the mysterious and ineffable aspects of our humanity.
People used to buy cd's. I used to buy cd's when I was in college. Every other week when I got paid, I'd go and buy a cd or two. I'd spend the the next two weeks reading music magazines and researching which cd I was going to buy next payday. I consumed a lot of music and was always trying to stay just ahead of the masses.
“Trick or treat?” he managed in a shaky voice, not his own at all.
I did do a job search and managed to get one, which is quite incredible (I honestly didn't think it would be so soon)! I'm doing data entry work for a Cape Town based tour company that is busy changing their system. It's slow going, but it's money - this is gooood! haha
We have, in posts past, addressed topics such as a) horrible things authors do; b) stupid things authors do; c) things I wish authors would do; d) horrible things agents do; e) stupid things agents do; and f) things I wish agents would do. I look at this list of topics and feel a sense of poor karma. I spend much time judging others. I'd like to take a break from that now, and offer you what I think is a fair rubric by which you should be able to judge me ("me" both specifically, if you know me, and metaphorically, as I might stand in for other editors).
He also picked up one of the books that we own this week, from Black Lagoon Adventures for a re-read. These are the early chapter books based on the popular picture book by Mike Thaler that he found at Half-Price Books sometime last year. At that point, he was a good reader, but not crazy about it, so you'd better believe that I was willing to spend $2 on as many of those as he wanted to buy since he'd actually read them.
I’ve known to be a dreamer, but I see myself see dreams that are possible to attain at some point, not only by wishing hard enough but also by working harder to live them. Currently, let’s say we are at ‘minus one’ and bits and pieces but a girl’s dreams can juggle the pieces into place right? I’d like to believe I can ( we can all believe what we like to, now can’t we)
In focusing of this year's word "Contentment" I have already been trying to focus on Him and leaning on him to provide for me a safe place. However, when I don't immediately see those times, I will continue to focus on God. Trusting Him to get me through it. I can't expect everything to always be rosy, but I can expect Him to be there with me until those mists lift, because He never makes any mistakes.
And it really helps me when editing. It’s much easier to cut a big chunk of text when I know that I can replace it with something in an illustration.
The kimoto style is very labor intensive, and monotonous, yet the workers depicted in the picture are apparently happy, taking pride in their labors. They understand the artisan nature of their work, and look forward to the wonderful sake that will be born of their labors. Such workers even sang while they worked, special brewing songs called sake-tzukuri uta. Not only did these songs help to relieve the monotony of some of their work, but they also assisted in proper timing, just as ancient mariners used music to help the timing of their rowers.
I went to a yoga workshop and the teacher messed up all the names of the poses. Plus, he made all these weird “mmmmmm” sounds. I felt like he was checking me out. He was very pretentious and obviously thought he was amazing. He wasn’t.
For one thing the European Union and the United States have both made it clear that they would not help fund a recovery package under a deal like this.
Jeter Thompson - Piano
Lots and lots and lots of juice.
I trawled the back alleys of my cookbook collection, and here's the closest printed thing I could find right offhand to the above:
Cake Liner & Clinique Cream Liner
This cute cottage was managed by a family who lived next door.
Pretty, pretty is dying.
“There is a lady who tells the story, which was good as it helps the younger children to know what is going on. Although I did think it made it more like a puppet show than a ballet.
Wings won’t take me
even advised not to go near
Oh, and if you're wondering why the shop is currently empty, it's because I'm up to my ears in orders right now. As soon as I get this batch of books finished and shipped I will add more listings. I'm so thankful for all the support and enthusiasm I've gotten about selling the books. When I listed the first one I didn't know what would come of it, but to have all the listings sell out in just a couple weeks time blew me away. So thanks!
To ice that particular cake, as I sat there writing the country soundtrack to my life, I heard from across the river valley the plaintive sound of (you guessed it) a train horn. "Really?" I said to myself, looking up at the ceiling, "I'm sitting here feeling sorry for myself, and there's a frickin' TRAIN out there?"
Scoffed at by his family and ex-wife, he turned to his two young daughters to fulfil him. He learned to braid their hair for school. He did their laundry, properly sorted and all. He made sure there was a nutritious breakfast each day, specializing in chocolate chip pancakes on the weekends. He learned to make quiche and chicken enchiladas. He made sure they took their Flintstones vitamins. He had them see a counselor with experience on dealing with children of divorced parents. He bought an ATARI, somehow, who knows how he got the money, but they played Pac-Man for hours together.
Because I believed I deserved it.......
I am no Netanyahu apologist. Aggressive Israeli colonisation must be stopped. But the majority of Israelis would agree with me. I know this, because it is a free society, with liberal democracy woven into its politics. I can go to its websites, and read about the differing shades of opinion. Can I do this in Syria? In Iran? And will I be able to in a future Egypt or Libya? Did anyone spot the Islamic Brotherhoos out on the streets throwing its weight about this morning? That didn’t take long.
Munch, munch, 'scrumptious' she thought.
Car: (shocked at the admission by the walrus) Dude, are you crazy?? You’re going to move over because you have a crush on the polar bear???!
The reality of the situation is that for many the purchase of a minivan is equated with the loss of being "cool" and also the acknowledgement that one is now an adult. Driving a Porsche = luxury and decadence while driving a minivan = responsibility and reliability. Being responsible is a bad word, I guess. When you are single, the idea of needing room for car seats and a trunk large enough for a double stroller does not enter your mind. However, when you've got two kids still in diapers and car seats and strollers and all their other stuff your opinion starts to change. You long for a car that can fit all their things, the possibility of another child, and yet still have room for more then one other grown-up.
I imagine that you are also aware that there are a multitude of South AFrican blogs, that are very 'liberal', that share your views, that will think you are a wonderful American, to think as you do, about Africans in general. I imagine your views would be welcomed there without so much as the smallest little bit of further enquiry as to whether they are based upon rational enquiry or feel good bleeding heart do-gooder guilt.
The living conditions caused Caroline Lucas to express her horror at both the living conditions of the residents and the fact that the owners of the disgusting hostel make thousands off the back of society's most vulnerable.
Stern’s figures were based on a financial assessment of the impact of global warming on future generations. The trouble with this is that it’s a very difficult and controversial calculation and one which economists love to argue and get upset about. Many queued up to trash Stern’s assumptions. This provided the denialists with a glut of ammunition and further confused the poor punters.
BOO! Happy?
My final time was 4:21:14. That is a PB of exactly 1 hour, 20 minutes and 1 second from VLM2011. Not quite my orginal target, but I am so happy with that time it’s unreal!!
Dhṛtarāṣṭra is a blind man who refused to relent the stewardship of the throne he assumed when his brother unexpectedly died before his five children were old enough to take the throne. The son of Dhṛtarāṣṭra is the leader of the Kurus: Duryodhana, who intends to be the next king.
So, it appears that good ol' Aunt Flo was in for a visit at the time of my last post. Since she has gone away so has the three pounds she brought with her. I am now back to the previously new low of 192. I am still in size 16's. I wonder if 14's will ever happen. So close....but so far away!
Heat a saucepan and when the butter in it is foaming add the shallots. Cook gently till translucent. Add the knotweed and stir, cooking for a couple of minutes until it changes from fresh green to drab khaki (just like sorrel). Add the potato and the hot stock and cook until the potato slices are tender. Allow the soup to cool a little and then puree in batches in a blender. Strain each batch to remove any fibers and return the saucepan to heat. Taste and adjust seasoning if necessary.
I’ve been to England a few times
Phil 4:18-19 But I have received everything in full and have an abundance; I am amply supplied…. And my God will supply all your needs according to His riches in glory in Christ Jesus.
Just make sure your personal interests don’t overshadow professional accomplishments. Being “the guy who ran a marathon” is fine, but being “the guy who is always training and traveling to marathons so we can never reach him when we need him” is not.
- DD, Basingstoke, Hants, 17/2/2012 21:37
-the Islamic worldview focuses on works
I’m just a 23 yr. old Ohioan, living the married life with my two large dogs, Charlie and Daisy.
So yeah...there are SOME things I can accomplish when I try.
I am sure Jane Austen used it.
High sodium loads in the body of people with impaired heart functioning can start a heart failure incident, which may lead to death. Not only is excessive salt hard on your blood vessels, it also affects your bones, kidneys, and your stomach.
‘people often define their sense of identity through their musical taste, wearing particular clothing, going to certain pubs and use certain types of slang.. it’s not surprising that personality should also be related to musical preference‘.
And, when you travel as a chaperone you are to be a nurse as well as a guardian angel. Each child is assigned to a seat, but somehow you never see it; no one is sitting in the right seat when you get there. Instead of two girls and two boys, it is boy-girl, boy-girl.
3/4 cup unsalted butter, softened
I told the doctor that it was my fault. I had caused this. He said no. He said that they don’t know for sure why children sometimes walk on their toes and that there was no need to blame myself. He said that the Botox treatment recommended previously was often not long lasting and needed to be repeated, whereas the surgery he would perform if done between the ages of 5 and 8 had a much greater success rate in terms of permanence. It was the perfect time for me to be addressing the problem. Still to me it felt that my guillotine had fallen but had landed on my baby.
So what about in our own little world? We all know too well the conversations, also known as bitching, where another woman is judged and deemed not up to scratch. We have heard them, heard about them, and we have certainly been part of them.
I don't want to put it out there unless I am doing my best, and I can't with this forum right now.
in the House 1/2 un houre before she
The only upside to that last part is that sleeping is one of the rare activities that keeps me from vomiting, the other two being working out and eating, which added together pretty much sums up how I've spent my recent days.
In the centre of a large courtyard, a beast sat on its muscular legs. Its maw was deep inside the stomach of a dead man, feasting loudly. Intestines had spilled out of the wound and now rested beside the body on the blood slick ground. Several more dead men were littered around, none of whom appeared to have been devoured.
pecked and tweaked,
No one was hurt and the 26 passengers that were on the train were taken to their destinations by taxi.
Every day, I have to read all my children individually and determine what their needs are and always be one step ahead of them at all times. This is hard when they are often unable to communicate their needs and I have to translate general conversations and directions into their dialect and be the mediator between them and the rest of the world.
This may not seem like a whole lot to you. But to me it was terrible. That’s because it felt like it happened in a period of 32 minutes.
This is a semi dry preparation. If you want a gravy version, add more water or coconut milk.
REPORTER: Norway.
We were asked and we thought it would be impolite to say no. We did not expect to get any further than being booed off the first night. We wrote "Hvar ertu nú?" in 10 minutes and ended up with a pretty good song if we say so ourselves. We really enjoyed going through the whole circus. The audience was new to us and we had an opportunity to try out live gimmicks on a bigger scale than usually. We also made a lot of good connections in Hafnarfjörður and Eastern Europe which will come in handy some day.
A man and a woman have been married for a few months. They are in love, they get on well, everything has been going well. Until, one day, the husband begins reading The God Delusion.
I am not happy with her. I need you in my life.
Members will take part in an online vote on these proposals from from mid-day on 1 December 2011 to mid-day on 8 December 2011. Ideally, one would hope that the proposers will take the criticism of the proposals on board and try to fix them before we have to vote, or at least separate out the controversial bits. If they don't, would voting against these proposals leave the BFS in a fix, as has been suggested? No, because the existing awards constitution, which is a pretty robust document, allows the committee to introduce changes by a formal vote. The new committee will be able to sift through the wreckage of these proposals and implement the bits that were a good idea (having a jury read the shortlist) and ditch the rest (pretty much everything else, as far as I can see).
May the United Methodist Church more and more look like Jesus Christ. I’ll let you know about my discussion with this artist in future blogs. Stay tuned!
Brown sugar cinnamon tortilla chips. Yummy yummy. I'm still perfecting the recipe, but here's what I'm going to do next time: set oven to broil, mix up sugar/brown sugar/cinnamon to taste, cut up tortillas into desired shapes, lightly brush with olive oil on both sides, place on cookie sheet, sprinkle with spice mixture, place in oven. Cook time depends on how 'done' you want them to be. I want mine slightly golden around the edges, and mostly crispy. Using corn tortillas will give you more of a Dorito crisp vibe, whereas flour is usually a little chewier. Since they're dessert chips,
Average Price: $7.99 six pack
Meanwhile, police units on the scene were ordered to remain outside the building and wait for a commando unit to arrive.
When European and US consumers think about what China makes, they reflexively turn to basic items such as textiles and toys, not necessarily the most innovative products and rarely associated with brand names. In fact, though, much product innovation in China stays there. A visit to a shop of the Suning Appliance chain, the large Chinese consumer electronics retailer, is telling. There, you might find an Android-enabled television complete with an integrated Internet-browsing capability and preloaded apps that take users straight to some of the most popular Chinese Web sites and digital movie-streaming services. Even the picture quality and industrial design are comparable to those of high-end televisions from South Korean competitors.
Best Picture MODERN TIMES, US
What is the name of your first school?
Favorite book to recommend to an eleven-year-old?
dunked grilled cheese with grafton sharp white cheddar
But the decision was made at six, the summer after my parents pulled me out of kindergarten, and looking back now, I feel like that was probably the first major decision I made in my life that went against the current. It seemed like everyone else ate meat, but this was not something I wanted to participate in. This is yet another time when I’m so grateful to have parents that supported such a decision, despite my young age.
I love chocolate and heart shaped pancakes.
The EIR database contains information on the identity of mobile equipment to prevent calls from stolen, unauthorized or defective mobile stations.
Sunday 09 August
Then, something happens. It gets quiet. Really quiet. You might, if you don’t have young kids, think that’s a good thing. But that’s never a good thing. Especially with boys. Now it’s serious. The monsters are probably doing something really bad. Preparing a ritual sacrifice, perhaps? Oh no. The oldest is probably preparing the youngest for sacrifice!
The 1 Saved By Grace
Now, you will notice this post is free of pictures of me cheesing it next to any of the Avengers. Or at least I hope you noticed. That is because it was too crazy, I was not able to get close enough. But, I am not even a little mad about it. My regular readers know I get the chance to meet so many of my favorite people. And, in doing that I have come to recognize about 30 other people who also do it regularly. So it blew my mind, that almost none of them were there. It was all new people, who were crazy passionate about this franchise and these characters. So if I am going to miss out, I would rather miss out to people who are passionate about this exclusively. So seeing people nerd out about meeting actors who play their favorite characters was enough to keep me happy. I feel very Oprah right now, watching other people’s happiness making me happy and stuff. Who am I?
We have known each other for 3 years now. During this time both of us grew immensely... often into opposite directions... and in some ways into the same direction. We often have to agree to disagree on certain subjects. And for the first time in my life I don't mind. I don't feel the need to convert her (not that that would work!!), I don't need to convince of how right I am. The simple fact is that it does not matter at all... because when it comes down to it... we do agree about the most important things in life. We just approach them differently. We love and respect each other for who we are, and we talk when we feel that something is wrong.
Coastal waterbirds in B.C. slipping away
Blueberry Pancakes
sydney had a teacher-workday today.
It’s all Nic O’demus’ fault this business. Creeping around in the dark wanting to see Jesus – wanting a private interview like an Irish scallywag!
The series began in 1940 as an outlet for information that may have been considered too unimportant, brief, or restricted to be submitted for formal publication. However, these notes are often of great interest to the specialists for whom they are designed and to whom their distribution is restricted.
1) they are a real life friend (not just cyber)
This upbringing has left me unable to entirely relate to a typical Danish upbringing.
All ready, sit down have some drinks
Fortunately; I love both.
Other writers (particularly the excellent and always through-provoking Dark Blue Jacket) have suggested that the Columbus Blue Jackets need to get rid of their longest-tenured, character-rotten core players. While I ultimately agree with this assessment, I differ on the reasoning and the eventual conclusion for new players to replace the core. I highly recommend reading the whole article (and the two pieces before it), but in summary DBJ explains his strategy as, “Extricate the core, protect the kids and backfill with tough veterans who know how to win and can teach the youngsters how to play winning hockey on a day-in, day-out basis.”
“Yeah,” Sandy interjected, “but now we can see it.”
OK. I better stop here. Time to get back to the mud and bleach. I used to hate the smell of bleach and now it's the most welcome smell.
They told me that a nuclear bomb had been brought in with their latest shipment of drugs.
However, now that you have resolved many of the external imbalances around you, the healing / harmonizing challenges are now of a more personal nature. So many of you are experiencing bodily distress, strange symptoms and illnesses that vary from mild disturbances to sudden chronic or critical conditions. Your OverSoul senses the level and mode of experience you are ready for at each stage of transformation. These conditions were / are not created as a punishment but are what was determined was or is needed for you to clear and release the deep-seated imperfections which are keeping you from moving forward to the next level or state of Being. Minor accidents, sudden chronic conditions which are difficult to heal, fevers, congestion and so on seem to be rampant among the “budding masters of the world.” Therefore, we are bringing to your attention a wondrous healing facility which has been waiting to assist you through these times of physical stress and dramatic change. It is also the reason we encouraged our messenger to compile the booklet outlining some of the major Ascension Symptoms so that you would have a better understanding regarding the radical changes that are taking place internally, along with the more evident outer world changes.
1 Mix the salmon with the avocado, spring onion and the coriander. Season with salt and pepper. Add the chili sauce, the olive oil and the lime juice and mix carefully.
Happy "hump" day, have a good one. Why not pop along to Julia's blog to see what everyone else is up to. Thanks for visiting my wee blog and I'll be along later today to have a wander.
3. What's a book that you'd recommend to someone that they should read?
So in this fast paced world where we want to show others the love Jesus has given us we also need to remember to rest awhile, we need to remember to get away and be alone with Jesus.
Sister, by a sizable margin
no not the half painted walls ....
A record about tiny epiphanies, Vespertine is riddled with "microsonics": the ultra-minimal texture riffs and rhythmic tics you find in techno sub-genres 'glitch' and 'clickhouse', from where she's drawn her latest cast of collaborators – Matmos, Matthew Herbert, Thomas Knak, Martin Console.
The rest of the plane is just standing there. Waiting. I start to giggle a little.
You, Dumbass, no matter how much you protest otherwise, only really like two kinds of wall colors: those that run the exciting gambit from creamy off-white to pale golden kakhi or those that range from grey/green/blue to blue/grey/green to green/blue/grey. No matter how hard you try to convince yourself that you are some sort of bon vivant BoHo artist, you are only a repressed small town Protestant who can't handle that much excitement in decor.
Digital Compass
What do you like about where you live?
Before he can get to this point, though, he has to pass through a cinematic gauntlet in which his greatest enemy is not a petty crook but a basic cinematic tool, the edit. Once Keaton steps up onto the movie screen, he's not fully integrated into the film that's playing. He's immune to the cut, so he remains the one constant as the scene changes, which leads to some hilarious visual gags. For a few minutes, the movie on the screen, following absurdist dream logic, ceases to be a coherent drama and starts randomly cutting from one strange locale to another, always with Keaton propelled across the cut into one outrageous situation after another. He balances on the edge of a cliff, runs from hungry lions, almost gets run over by a train and the traffic on a crowded street, and gets soaked by waves while perched on a rock in the middle of a choppy sea. It's both a devilishly clever comic showcase and a lovingly meta ode to the power of this cinematic tool, which can seamlessly bridge such tremendous gaps in location, having Keaton jump into the air to dive into the water but instead land headfirst in a snowbank, his feet kicking in the air.
Food Thoughts:
Homeowners with a 30-year, fixed-rate mortgage lowered interest rates by 1.5 percentage points, according to a report released Tuesday by Freddie Mac. Those reductions translate into a savings of $2,900 in interest payments in the first year of a $200,000 loan.
Litchfield was wonderful!!! In fact I would go as far as to say it's better than Kakadu. If you are ever in the situation where you have the opportunity to visit either Kakadu or Litchfield then I would definitely say Kakadon't. Hehehe! I wish I could claim that joke as my own but I can't. I heard it from Kristy, who heard it from her friend Kelly, who heard it from her husband....
but I can't stay away
Unlimited time off, formerly known as the work week.
Sam: Do they smell like pee?
But that is who I am.
3. By the time I get home from running errands - we are ALL glad to be home!
our BE inspired challenge only has 2 day's left.. so if you were going to enter this challenge for your chance to win free acrylic stamps... do it before it's over!
If I fall to the left, I am letting hateful, negative, scared feelings about Jermaine rule the decisions I make about him and how I feel about him. If I fall to the right, I am letting all the loving, kind, optimistic feelings about Jermaine rule the decisions I make about him and how I feel about him.
Field Greens
you'll be delighted to know that i have decided where my next trip will be.
so i guess, it’s really just a little bit more of what i’m already doing, but with a more serious focus.
My Aunt Jean, (Caroline Montgomery) was probably the first person to take me to a library. I can remember visiting her home, and the thrill I would feel when she would announce that we were going to the library. Walking along the hushed aisles of that amazing place, I would run my fingers along the spines of the colorful volumes, awed at the treasures that awaited me within the pages of those books.
For the second year, Bruegger’s has partnered with Children’s Miracle Network to make the Bottomless Mug even more special. For every mug purchased from October 27, 2011 through January 31, 2012, Bruegger’s will donate a portion of the proceeds to Children’s Miracle Network benefiting local children’s hospitals throughout the country. Bruegger’s hopes to raise $100,000 for Children’s Miracle Network this year.
In other words, it's mainly a series of poignant vignettes about living on the street, punctuated with the odd exploding hobo and impromptu game of severed penis football.
In conclusion, tata, I hope my letter does not upset you too much, but sometimes we need to take toll and assume responsibilities for our failures. We've failed our people. There's no other way of looking at it. I don't see the bunch that came after you doing things better, instead things seem to be going from bad to worse.
Every tribe, tongue, and nation
Three things, actually.
I’ve got to get this figured out. The end of May is coming fast, and I have to be at least upright ON SKATES before I go to the first training sessions. It’s put up or shut up time.
While this does occasionally happen to me in real life (Don’t forget your anti-gravity boots once popped into my head while having an argument) I have to say that there is nothing else in the book that is at all autobiographical.
today you held my hand on several occasions you knew
We'd get all teary and verklempt at Notre Dame and the Louvre and take crazy pictures of ourselves pinching landmarks between our thumb and forefinger and re-enacting cheesy mime scenes.
Deadlifts 5-5-5
a huge accomplishment for a challenge that is only a year old.
That drifts among the surging throng.
But a great little homewares shop in town (The Flying Fish, Nanaimo) had some wonderful cushions using recycled saris to embroider designs on a neutral background -- you can see one, with the zigzag patterns above, and another below, with the three large stylized flowers at the right below. By my standards, they were expensive ($90 each!!), so I hesitated a day or two, but I suspected they would be the key to pulling together a collection of less expensive pillows.
I did enjoy your crafty show. It gave me some ideas for the upcoming VLVS blog hop in May! I love the milk jug! Thank you for the chance to win a fantastic prize!
Oh the joys of parenthood!
4)
will take us through until June.
The Q&A session focused on:
Him: Awesome. See ya in an hour.
Part of what is terrifying about this is that the people who are supposed to protect our loved ones—no matter what their race, sex, ability, age—cannot be trusted. If the police force doesn’t educate their officers about disability, incidents like this can happen again. It wasn’t long ago (2007) that a Polish immigrant with mental challenges, Robert Dziekański, was killed by RCMP Tasers.
State Law:
18. Note the harsh criticism of Inspector Little for arguing that: ‘everybody should be treated the same’ (para, 12.60). Note the following: ‘“Colour-blind” policing must be outlawed. The police must deliver a service which recognises the different experiences, perceptions and needs of a diverse society.’ (para, 45.24).
This will lift your mood -- It's a sincerely moving video from State Farm, which partnered with director Spike Lee to film this tribute to thank the heroes of New York. Nearly 150 school children from the New York City area visited four firehouses, including the Middagh Street house, and sang the New York song.
Seventh card the questioner card - denotes your attitude toward the current situation. Usually the card meaning is weakened some Hmmm, have you been considering having another baby? Or someone around you? Ok, this card does show maternity. I'm wondering if your path may be leading you toward other mothers or if you're going to be a maternal presence. It also shows some balance issues. So you will want to narrow things down so that you don't lose balance
We certainly should criticize the ISI for supporting a political party but we shall also not forget the outstanding services of Lt. Gen. Pasha as he was the most important thorn after Gen. Kayani which the US & Pakistani Government wanted to remove. We must not forget the fact that ISI is our first line of defence & DG-ISI is one of the most important posts in Pakistan keeping in mind the geo-political & regional situation. We should also be practical and not just go blind in our criticism of ISI. I very strongly believe that involvement of ISI in politics is an absolute NO-NO.
The result is a montage of moving, magical moments from the original campaign images: romantic, ethereal and in keeping with the aesthetics and theme of Mulberry's Spring Summer 2011 season.
Going to poetry readings, creating visual art projects together, doing communal art projects does help create a sense of community, connection and empathy. When we realize that we are all connected, then we do become creative and empathic in new ways. We know that by going to art workshops, joining art groups and spending an afternoon playing with a friend in our studio, helps us feel freshly creative in new and different ways. Deep empathy is a knowledge that we are not that different. There is something about working together to create something new that joins us at a heart level. There is a nakedness when we are creating something due to our usual barriers and defenses being lowered, we are more present, and emotionally unguarded. In my Art Therapy practice I have watched many tough boys soften and tear up when they are making something with me.
So while we can’t really comment on the accuracy of the title of that particular Malaysiakini story, we can certainly say they were at least on the right track which is more than you can say for Bernama, whose suggestion of Saiful inflicting a “Heavy Toll on Anwar” has been proven to be nothing more than mere BN propaganda. While there are those who criticise Malaysiakini as being too pro-Opposition you can definitely say they are far fairer and more accurate in their reporting than Bernama (and have more cojones than The Star who on the eve of polling chose to headline the weather forecast in Permatang Pauh…)
The project still has a long way to go, and not much time to do it in — so if you’re interested in a very light, very useful bit of kit that’ll take up almost no space in your camera bag, why not throw your weight behind the FlashPipe?
But I was reminded of her again today when I was talking with a friend of mine. This friend is struggling. She wants to lose weight so she can feel good about herself and be comfortable in her own skin. She wants to take control of her life. And she reminds me a lot of that girl in the red dress.
Recently, I have had some unusual things popping up in my garden. Sometime around Thanksgiving I found a rake had been placed in my garden. At first I thought my neighbors left it out, and a passerby put it in my yard thinking it was mine, but it did not belong to my neighbors. Then about a week later I found two more rakes in the same place. I always wait until the last leaf falls to do any raking, so maybe someone was trying to drop a hint. On Monday of this week I found another rake not far from where the others were left. I now have four new rakes, on top of the two I already own. So I am either being pranked, my yard is some sort of lost and found area, or someone is up to no good. I just wish they would quit with the rakes and leave me a pair of 30" Felco bypass loppers or a Hayauchi 16' telescoping pole pruner. These I could use.
Zuckerman BS, Frank DA, Hingson R, Morelock S, Kayne HL. Impact of maternal work outside the home during pregnancy on neonatal outcome. Pediatrics 1986; 77: 459-464.
This was taken many yeas ago; back in High School. There was a field trip to New York city and French and I both really wanted to go. The problem was that you had to be in the enrichment class, or in drama. French and I always took art class, never drama, and somehow we never ended up in the enrichment class (oversight).
Much, much bigger than a traditional brown ale, though not as harsh as a barleywine, and more mellow than an old ale, the Palo Santo is a fabulous beer that should be reserved for special occasions, a digestif to wrap up your day. For those who are less alcohol tolerant, I would recommend sharing with an appreciative friend. I have no doubt these will age well, and though I drank 2 (1 was shared) out of the 4-pack, my intention is to purchase some more and age for upcoming Christmas festivities.
To most of us this seems slightly retarded. (In the true meaning of the word. *held back intellectually* not in the insulting way most people use the word) but there are still people out there that can not accept the fact that evolution is simply evolution.
The Jacksonville Jaguars traded up to #5 to select highly rated wide receiver Justin Blackmon. The Oklahoma State star joins a team that boasts 2nd year quarterback Blaine Gabbert. Gabbert, the Jags round one pick in 2011 had a rocky rookie season.The addition of Blackmon however gives Jacksonville a legit outside threat. That’s something that they haven’t had consistently since the glory days of Jimmy Smith and Keenan McCardell. To go along with top five running back Maurice Jones-Drew, the Jags offense could grow leaps and bounds very quickly. Consitency from Gabbert will be the key to just how quickly.
Rene W.
"Hahaha. Uhmm ... sige. Ako na lang pupunta diyan. (I'll just go to your place.)"
google search terms; alternative + energy, renewable + energy, green + investments, clean + energy, united + states + energy, global + energy, middle + east + oil, alternative, renewable, energy, green+ business, wind + mills, wind + power, lithium + battery+ power, electric + cars, hybrid + cars, investment + bankers, green + business + funding, alternative + renewable + energy, alternative + energy+ inventions, biofuel, clean + fuel, solar + power, solar+ panels, green + stocks, ecology, eco, global + warming, climate + change, green + inventions, green+ solutions, global + alternative + energy + solution, energy + solutions, clean + air, air + pollution, combustion + engines, environment, environmental+ protection, don + pentecost, global +alternative+ energy + solutions, alternative + energy + solutions, germany +alternative+ energy, china +alternative + energy, india +alternative +energy, brazil +alternative + energy, european + alternative + energy, formula 1 + DeBrasil, porsche + road + racing, qatar + oil, kuwait + oil, saudi + oil, saudi + arabia + oil, abudhabi + oil, dubai + oil, norway + alternative + energy, norway + oil, norway + energy + investments.
The wolf has held an honored place in many mythologies, folklore and religions throughout human history and across many cultures. Wolves were and are creatures to be respected, feared, and admired. For these animals, the extended family unit or pack is the center of their lives. Wolves show great nurturing and gentle care for one another, while also displaying vicious ferocity and cunning on their hunts, in competition with one another, and in the defense of territory and their pack. They are animals of great intelligence and physical prowess.
“I know, we’re fighting for our group to gain power. We’re fighting to become better. But what then? What if we win and what if we keep the title and the power and the control? Is this all just going to come down to that?”
In a gym where Silva taught Andy Ganigan, Jesus Salud, Brian Viloria, Paul Lucas and generations of others the finer points of boxing and still gives instruction, Pasion wandered in. “I watched the boys sparring,” she recalls. “Then, I asked him to train me, too. He’s the best, he knows what he’s talking about and you can trust him. He loves the sport.”
I'm not sure if I am being seen as a guy or as a woman anymore. Those who know me still see the guy and those who have not met me....well... it's up for grabs these days.
Of those picked for the contest:
In an article entitled “Legal Beagles in Cross Hairs” WSJ reports that the SEC and many others in law enforcement have on-going investigations into the role of attorneys not misconduct of their clients. For the most part it is an attorney’s solemn duty to represent and advocate the position of his or her client to the utmost of their ability without violating the law. Everyone is entitled to a lawyer no matter how reprehensible their conduct might have been when they committed the act.
The Lord, on this occasion of His weeping, described to us that overthrow of Jerusalem which took place under the Emperors Titus and Vespasian. There is no one who has read the history of that history can doubt. For the Roman rulers are here referred to when He says: For the days shall come upon thee; and thy enemies shall cast a trench about thee, and compass thee around, and straiten thee on every side, and beat thee flat to the ground, and thy children who are in thee.
While Paul’s crawled through the back of America’s collective pop culture mind, the Beasties regrouped and put out the massive Check Your Head in 1992, the strong Ill Communication in 1994, and the excellent Hello Nasty in 1998. Along the way, they established a music label and what might be described as the hipster magazine, Grand Royal. Again, though Rap Rock (ugh) like Limp Biscuit and others became annoyingly common in the mid to late 1990s, the Beasties distilled the formula earlier and with greater purity. MCA, Ad Rock, and Mike D added their punk upbringing to the sounds emanating from the Bronx and Brooklyn. Instead of Blondie’s odd appropriation “Rapture,” the Beasties leaned more toward the Clash’s “Magnificent Seven,” sonically and politically. No songs about “doing it all for the nookie”; instead they talked about rank commercialism on “Pass the Mic” - “Everybody’s Rapping Like It’s A Commercial/ Actin’ Like Life Is A Big Commercial” – or affirming living on “Gratitude”:
I’ll be leaving December 18th and coming back January 2nd. It’ll be another solo trip and a bit different from Honduras as I don’t plan on heading to the ocean. I’m not quite sure what route I’ll take but I have some time to figure out a rough idea.
next level—engagement?Well, I’m glad you asked.Before you can be physically intimate
News from Boise State University…
Exercise Prescription: get out and do the things you like most of the time and do some challenging movements here and there.
Want to be featured in a Reader Space edition? Have an awesome organizing story to share? I am looking for projects that have made a positive impact to your life. Please send your story and photos to iheartorganizing@gmail.com and I would heart to feature them right here, on the blog!! Photos should be high resolution and un-editted. Please include a description of the project, including any costs, inspiration, and how it has changed your life and routine for the better! Oh, and no worries my friends, we will NEVER judge "before" pictures because that just wouldn't be nice! Only love goes on at this blog! More Info HERE.
Still, north and south proceeded to the referendum while drawing a line under more than half a century of fighting.
Now, my world revolves around You.
With the necessary supplies and tools now in hand, I returned home and decided to try to tackle the shelf. I wish that I could say that I got it right on the first try or that I was even smart enough to practice on a piece of scrap wood before trying to drill the recessed holes in the actual shelf. Not so much. I used a couple adjustable clamps to secure the shelf to my work bench, loaded the 2″ bit into my drill, and plowed forward like I was a pro who knew exactly what he was doing. I mean how hard can it be to drill the recessed holes; I’ve used a drill a lot before. Well, it turns out that I should have practiced because I didn’t use the proper speed for the drill bit and it got stuck and made an uneven cut on the first hole. Somehow, I managed to correct this mistake and moved on to the second depression, which is where I encountered the fatal problem. Apparently, I didn’t clamp the shelf appropriately for the torque the drill put on the piece of wood, especially since the bit caught the edge of a knot in the wood, because the shelf twisted as I was applying pressure to drill through the knot causing the drill bit to skip and really mess up the hole. The damage was far too great to fix this time, and I realized I had just ruined my shelf. What an idiot. After the drilling debacle, I now had to cut, sand, and burn another shelf. I wasted a whole lot of time and energy that I could have saved by simply taking the time to practice first. Lesson learned.
Busy cooking at home whole day. I'm in the mood of cooking, since it made the room warmer.
Jintan: I’ve got it. Then, should I enter their difference here, right?
Next in line for dream fulling cogs is an extra job as a dishwasher or pizza delivery boy. Either would be great and I hope to get them soon or at all!
The Great Red Dragon is a pretty sweet sounding record, with that aforementioned guitar sound, the clarity of the drums and vocals and, surprisingly, a nice thick bass tone which anchors it all into a darker, foreboding space. Many bands spend whole careers concocting such a balance, yet Hellspawn have done it in just two full-length records. The only caveat here is that, while I appreciate the band's infernal level of energy, and the fact that they keep the tunes tense, brief and incendiary, nothing ever feels quite that unique or memorable. This is a well-rounded effort, mind you, and few songs feel precisely the same, plus it has the benefit of arriving and departing in under 28 minutes, and some well written, blasphemous lyrics, but I wouldn't call it infectious. That said, fans of classic 90s brutality like the earlier efforts of Vader or Hate, or Morbid Angel circa Covenant will likely find it a formidable listen.
How can he make such a statement? First of all he is reminded of the source of true joy and happiness. That source is God, through Jesus Christ. The prosperity of the world is empty and fleeting. But, God is the same yesterday, today and forever. He isn’t changed by circumstances, political upheaval, natural disaster or physical adversity. He alone is the source of our happiness.
In today's "New York Times" there are two separate articles that I think are important harbingers that something is rotten in the digital world. While digitally-driven companies like Google and Facebook claim they want to change the world--that kind of hubris is in their very mission statements--they don't seem to realize that real human intercourse will never be replaced by binary code or 140-character tweets.
Me: Actually, it is. (because arguing like this with an eight year old is so effective)
The books were recommended to me by two different people. Two people on two occasions. Met up with a friend a few weeks ago. She talked about books.
I say this underestimates both craft brewing and the American beer drinker. In fact, if you paraphrase Crouch's piece and substitute "microbrews" for "session beers," it reads almost exactly like it was written by a smug mainstream brewer in 1992: micros get lots of press but they don't actually sell; ales aren't American and they're heavy so most Americans won't like them; they cost more than anyone's going to pay; the whole idea's too complicated because we really just want to drink a beer; it's too much work for a bar to carry or a bartender to answer questions about so it won't work.
This is not to say that committees were perfect or are inevitably the best solution. They can, and often were, criticised – for being slow to make decisions, leaving it unclear who was responsible for decisions, and for sustaining silos (such as Education authorities) which at times seemed to have little involvement with other parts of the council. The criticisms can be answered. The committee system can be fast, and keep confidences, when it matters. With a cabinet, or indeed an elected mayor, leadership is still distributed – with chief executives or chief officers often the real leaders. Silos can be broken down if there is the political will to do so. But none of this is easy, and there were plenty of disillusioned and frustrated councillors and officers in the past. All we can say with confidence is that no system is perfect and that each council needs to work out what is best for its own purposes.
STEPHEN Curry admits that the words “chicken sexer” to the uninitiated can prompt amusement.
Whenever you post your creations using Kims products online, make sure the credit reads “by KimB Designs” or “Kim Broedelet” somewhere in it. You can post wherever you like, whether it be a gallery or your blog or even facebook! I’m not just checking one site, I’m checking the ENTIRE WEB!!!
And the best part of all...
Whilst I have posted before that Mr Sheridan’s lack of a full legal training and experience has meant that prosecutions for perjury of certain of the witnesses in his case is less likely as his questions were often not sufficiently precise, he deserves credit here for getting DCS Williams to agree that the figures given, whilst not precise, were pretty close. I do not intend to suggest that it was DCS Williams’ intention to downgrade the effect of the numbers put to him – but that, if he had not been pursued further, would probably have been the effect.
Ernie detailed the chemistry behind the crumbling mortar. He described the tortuous path of our choked chimney flue. He expounded on building codes and brick densities and boiler fire forensics. Clearly, he was the right man for the job. Then Ernie said he was bringing his jackhammer. All visions of Dick Van Dyke in Mary Poppins vanished.
If you want to link to your own "Five Things for Friday" post you can use the tool below to add your link. 1) Please link to the URL of your blog post and not your main blog and 2) Please include a link
Many years ago , I fiddled around in the world of textile design. I freelanced for months at a time. I sold some patterns independently. Some of which I still see on occasion and point out to my kids - "Look! I designed that print!" others I see, and think to myself "enh, I got paid." ( think, Vermont Country Store night gown prints and TJ Maxx old lady Nighties )
Or it could just be because I was sick of the 30 items I chose.
For the back I finished it off as per this tutorial. I didn't have any double-sided tape in the house though, so it's just sitting there under it's own pressure at the moment.
Starring: Rosalind Russell, Brian Aherne
Whisk together the dry ingredients in a bowl then set aside.
SCHLESSINGER: Why don't you let me finish a sentence?
Science loves discovering things which it can’t explain, and which shatter old paradigms. Find us some actual evidence, or even just show us what’s going on and let us find it, and the scientific and skeptical community will totally be on your side. Stop holding press conferences and asking for more and more research money. It’s not working.
10. Bask in your amazingness.
Back to the situation i am aware of… i was telling my wife the other day how i wish it was legal to flog these parents… To beat them senseless…. to withhold food from them… the anger in my chest rose like a flood, flushing my cheeks. I could feel it and can now even as i write these words… the flood of anger burns my eyes with the coming of tears…
The first complaint was filed on the day the J.C.A.R.R.
they subsume the walls into flowerness,
With all the things you’re doing to distract
The menu is filled with prawns tonight and the next dish is butterflied BBQ prawns on a bed of chilli basil vegetables, with wakame (seaweed) and shredded carrot salad. The prawns are quite big and a bit messy to eat as we try to get them out of the shells; they are lightly grilled with a slight charred flavour. It’s best to dip the prawn meat into the chilli basil sauce which is spot on, savoury and garlicky. The wakame salad is a bit of an eccentric addition to the dish as it is a Japanese delicacy rather than Thai, but still tastes fresh.
Broadening Horizons for Academic Research
I am a fan of Nasa and the work they do as they follow how earth is changing. The reasons may be debatable and I am convinced that it is a very complex mixture of human actions and natural cycles out of our control. But becoming aware of what is happening, even if it happens slowly, is very interesting to me. What do you think?
The Hubs said, I should check "Asian" instead.
‘National tragedy’
The shot above was taken a couple of hours into the long haul from Sydney to San Francisco aboard a United Boeing 747. Then some hours later, I gazed through my window as I tried to sleep - and sat there transfixed by the colours that began to develop on the horizon, from my vantage point more than 30,000 feet up.
Of course I am not talking about fats that come from french fries, burgers, cakes, or chocolates. I am talking about good fats that come from olive oil, coconut oil, nuts, and seeds. Polyunsaturated and monounsaturated fats are rich of Omega-3 and Omega-6 fatty acids, which promote fat loss. Of course we still have to control the amount of good fats we consume.
4.) Jaja
4. Smashing Pumpkins - Crush
Krynoids start life as small pods, generally only about 20 centimetres in diameter. Possibly due to the Krynoids' home planet being an extremely volatile environment, many of these pods are launched into space (always in pairs). These pods can survive long trips in space, being able to hibernate for thousands of years.
Today 37 handmade Valentines were delivered to friends, family and school staff. It was the 11th year of a Valentine tradition I began with my daughter when she was in preschool.
And don't get discouraged as you are going to make an even bigger mess.
So, after this experience Cameron and I decided to wait until we get back to the States to have kids. Obviously.
either when it's happening.
I'd like to see Police Chief Scott come to Springfield. In any case he's done a splendid job in Holyoke.
----So, a few hours after writing this, I'm still awake, but I was watching a wonderful video that I love and makes me ready to sleep (at 3 am, at work at 8 am)! I hope you enjoy. This is how I feel, and this is what Jesus is all about. (If this doesn't show up, because of my illiteracy, check out "Children of God" by Third Day on YouTube.
‘Heard It All Before’ is notable in my book at least, for the kind of dark mood and outstanding soulful and bluesy female backing / harmonising vocals – especially in the latter half when the song’s intensity develops and Kate Peters is given more room to showcase her power.
The Thunderstorm scene where they slept together for the night is just sooo sweet! Because of that scene, I would want the weather to always have thunder storm, particularly at night!!!! Just to have that chance to sleep beside Jin Ho, him embracing me and feel his protection is way better than anything!! I love Gaein’s forecast here:
I like the idea of this feature, and look forward to sharing the next few days with you. Be excited!!!
After the many months since the finale I was extremely interested to see and hear viewers thoughts and ideas about what they experienced over the six seasons of LOST. I was also curious to see if their ideas and theories changed over time since the finale. I utilized Facebook as a small forum to present questions to fans regarding general topics of the LOST story. I loved the excitement with all the LOST talk, but honestly was troubled by the amount of anger I witnessed when someone didn't share similar views. Nonetheless everyone threw something into the LOST stew.
my friends like the pictures i share on FB. their happiness gives me tremendous joy. often i don't know the reasons behind their impressions. i don't even try to understand. it is enough that they allow me the freedom to capture these memories, and that they like my albums. i didn't know it at the beginning. but, now i think that, completely by accident, i have created a chronicle of the tango life in my community. even as i type these words, i cannot help but be giddy.
Do you know how many different ways predators could be spying on you right now?
You can treat all students exactly the same or you can treat students in a manner that is appropriate for their situation. That is treating them equitably, not equally.
There’s a thin line between love and hate, and an even thinner one between using your self-doubt as a positive force and allowing it to destroy your confidence. Writers, especially new ones (hark at me), can focus too much on their weakness, telling themselves that they’re not good enough, and end up stultifying their talent. Hey, nobody said this writing malarkey was easy. If it was, anyone would be able to knock out a book, ignore the editing process, pop it up for sale on an online bookseller’s site for 99p or give it away. Oh, er, hang on a minute…
Cockney: "Whoh?"
can you spy daisies and cow parsley ????
3. Mallory and Catcher have sparks so intense they almost fly off the page…..what do you think of this cozy couple? Did you like the insta-love between them? Do they add to the story?
How are you on this lovely day, ok, maybe morning or night, right, now nearly 8.45pm here, people ate, dogs fed, yikes it feels like i just ran the marathon, lol
My daughter is doing so good in school! She is reading a TON of sight words and sounding everything out. She is writing letters to Daddy and loves to draw and color. She likes to draw/design dresses and clothing. She wants long hair but doesn't brush it very well and hardly ever lets me pull it up or fix it (this drives me crazy!). She is a girly girl who will climb in a mud-puddle, salt slugs, or ride the scary rides at the carnival!
But I can’t repent
1/2tsp baking powder
"The train in front has lost its pilot light".
while telling me his tale. Once, he transformed
So yea... I'm planning to drop all my paying jobs and sell my soul to the devil to create an inspiring work environment that makes me do a happy jig everytime I walk through the door. The question is: can I make it work with that floor? (Seriously it's terrible.)
NON-PARTICIPATION - believe it or not, I started a list. Each time I clicked a link to a blog that wasn't playing along, I wrote down their number, but I got bored and stopped doing it. I know stuff happens and a bunch of bloggers do have exciting lives off their computers (lucky), but if you have no intentions of participating, please don't sign up just to increase traffic to your blog. (a nice little blurb stating you know you signed up, but something came up is always a great idea)
It appears that a vampire-like clique directs the world. This secretive cabal is represented by our dominant political, economic and cultural institutions. Western society has been subverted and western culture is bankrupt. Democracy is a form of social control and the mass media/ education are systems for indoctrination.
The thing is, I know everything is gonna be fine, i just wish i knew why or had proof, but well, gut feelings cause the ol’ anxiety sometimes cause there’s nothing to substantiate it in physical reality, but i know, all will be well, well will be all, all that good stuff. It’s only gonna get better from here on out, and it makes me nervous, it makes me feel a pressure to not screw up, and well, that pressure has to go away, because i trust myself, i trust my loved ones, i trust the world that it, me, them, i, you, everything, will all be well.
"It looks solid."
It is a very interesting article, which is part of the book “The Just War: Violence in Judaism, Christianity and Islam,” where Firestone reviews the basic understanding of the concept of ‘Holy War’ in Judaism and according the Hebrew Scriptures, the basis for the Three Vows, as well as later reactions for or against them, as well as interpretations of them, particular in the period of 1948 to recent days.
her eyes darted from side to side looking for help, knowing no one was there.
Kitchen Trends: Although tile, wood and laminate flooring remain popular choices, marble flooring is the latest trend for high-end kitchens.
"Here's a wallet for you and five nicker for me"
Me: “No, it’s McDonalds, they have burgers and chicken and fries.”
- place the apples, 1 tablespoon of the lemon juice and sugar in a saucepan and gently heat until the apples turn to mush. this should take about 10 minutes with the lid on.
Well here is my entry for the Sunday on Corrosive Challenge Blog :) I`m in this clean and simple mood so I came up with this keep things simple as the days seem to be just flying by...Before we all know it Christmas will be here!!! Is everyone finished their cards....
If you haven’t read 1Q84 yet, then you definitely have something to look forward to. It’s an incredible novel that will give you the sort of reading experience that the word “spellbound” was created for. This a book that will make you wish your two-hour jog on the treadmill, your fourteen-hour plane ride, or your week-long illness were actually longer. Since 1Q84 will consume your life until you’re done with it, it might be good to save it for an occasion when you can take some time off so that real life doesn’t get in the way of this book.
David Allan Coe featuring Bareback Jack – 9:00 p.m. – Club Infinity
Red Hot Chili Peppers Fight like a brave US
Well I guess Jesus didn’t come to eat food nether expected any entertainment he came for fellowship
Some hear strange voices in their dreams, as if someoneis hovering near them. You can either ask the presence(s) to leave or ask Archangel Michael to take care of the situation. Again, there is nothing to fear.
And you know she’s your best friend when she knows you better than you even know yourself and can say what you’re feeling without you even uttering a word.
I whispered to my least excitable friend my predicament, who in turn whispered to my most excitable friend, who in turned announced to the whole restaurant that my water had broken and I was going to have a baby. The restaurant erupted into applause (I am aware that this is like a scene from a bad romantic comedy but I am not exaggerating, all four of you who read this blog are not going to believe me but it is so embarrassingly true). Needless to say the soft-spoken owner seemed relieved to have me ushered out the door by my friends.
I am just off the phone speaking to a customer service representative at the call center of SMART TV/SKYY PLUS. I am a very frustrated man.
His chin stopped shaking as he felt both confusion and curiosity, "But you've killed dozens of people."
Heckler: What’s it about?
Coastal Aviation (coastal.cc) and Tropical Air (tropicalair.co.tz) run daily, 30-minute flights between Dar es Salaam, Tanzania, and Mafia (from $145).
I remember, right before my grandfather’s untimely death, grabbing his oversized Bible, constructing a make-shift pulpit in front of the long dining room table where my relatives were all eating and, while I couldn’t read a word, giving my first sermon. I shouted, “What is the truth?”
Preorder : May 2, 2012 to May 29, 2012
Even then, I knew I was furious because Richard Laymon didn’t allow the book to write itself. Instead he imposed a graphically violent, verging-on-pornographic, coming-of-age story on it, forever ruining the best title ever conceived.
30 Days(He is the Prime Minister People)
- Broadway/ Kiss nails: 20% off.
they would.
Baird Suruga bay DIPA
Get offa mah lawn!
Went with: Michael on a Tuesday night
Cover the entire piece with black paint, and go gingerly around the edges, to avoid pulling up the tape.
Mat Stack 4 die
If you only had yourself to depend on everything would get done when you needed it to be done, it would get done how you wanted it to be done, and you would be more productive. Right? Not necessarily. One is the Loneliest Number in Time Management. It may be true that only you can do a certain job at the high level of quality you want. You need to ask yourself does the job have to be done exactly like you want, or is good enough, good enough?
those that report news be
“The only hope for Britain is to leave the EU and become an independent nation.”
None of the six former officials could be reached for comment yesterday. Meanwhile, Vijay Padmanabhan, a former state department lawyer, said the creation of the Guantánamo Bay detention camp was "one of the worst over-reactions of the Bush administration".
~ melon-colored nail polish ~
Mike has been wanting to pick up his blog again, so he's entertaining the thought of having a "life + style" blog, too, including Toby + Dad outfit posts! How cute would that be?! I really hope he goes through with it because it just sounds fantastic. (He may need some encouraging though!)
Line a baking tray with silver foil and arrange the tomatoes on it, cut side up.
It is interesting that the body will automatically assume certain positions and postures that help the flow of energy. The movements that happen beforehand might be gyrations, twistings, contortions, shaking, etc. It is not painful, but rather incredibly blissful. The expenditure of energy can be quite high though and the breath finds its own pattern, depending on the posture or movement.
I leap aboard a railway car;
Looking for a chance to make money rather than spend it? Bring your snorkeling, or even scuba gear and search the bottom of this clear river for lost valuables, as they can easily be found along the entirety of the float.
After a nightmare is finished Vincent’s life continues and the story progresses. Vincent has to try to figure out how to handle his relationship with Katherine while trying to get Catherine out of the picture and his friends lend their ears and give him advice. At the end of the day you end up in a bar where you can talk to your friends and the regulars and keep in touch with Katherine. Time passes each time you speak with somebody or take a drink making it possible to miss conversations with characters. There is an arcade game called Rapunzel that is a variation of the climbing puzzles in the nightmare which is both addicting and difficult.
Black is 000,000,000 (ie no light).
It's wild out there. Leaves, branches, shaking and shuddering. The bush by the window has a fit now and then, as though it had come to the end of its tether. (It has no tether.) The sky is clearing but only to an aqueous grey-green that means every thought in its head is of more rain.
My next book is called REFUGE and is about refugees in Glasgow who are going missing under very mysterious circumstances, and the journalist character Rosie Gilmour is getting stuck into the investigation. I’m using my experience as a frontline reporter in troublespots all over the world to make the story feel real, and to help create characters with big backstories, who find themselves in Glasgow during a time when the city seems to have refugee fatigue. A lot of the novel is set in Glasgow as I like to retain that with all my novels as it’s my stomping ground. But it’s important to me to take Rosie out of the city and give her big stories all over the world, which is what I did. This investigation takes her to Bosnia, Belgrade and Kosovo, and it’s a ripping story that moves at such an incredible pace it was even hard for me to keep up with it!
With many different types, flavors, and even decaffeinated varieties available, finding one that tastes best and has no side effects should be easy. Many website also provide useful information on a variety of teas to help when choosing which to drink. Grocery stores, specialty tea retailers, and even online suppliers are all source for obtaining this beneficial addition to any diet.
S) That he will not feel the agonies and distress of death.
cozy socks on chilly days
Nebraska Brewing Company Melange A Trois
I’ve had the paint for two weeks and have said every day for two weeks that I’m going to paint the ceiling…and you can see that hasn’t happened.
The challenge was to Re-make and Decorate the fuzzy little Bears .Five Girls brought finished and Gift wrapped Bears for the Swap. We put numbers in a hat to see who would pick first , I pulled the number 2 .
One day, on a sunny morning in March 2008, a pigeon appeared on the balustrade of our balcony on the higher levels of the appartment building. There was something about this pigeon that made me wonder who he was. Normally I would have chased him off – as I usually did – because of my ignorance, because I did not like them pooping everywhere, because they made so much noise in the early morning that you could not sleep any more and overall I did not like pigeons very much… But this one – it was different.
23. Hawaii.
"Every great guerrilla marketer is a bit of a scamp; a person who is constantly evaluating the rules that make up conventional thinking looking for the ones just screaming to be broken. If the bowling ball is the implacable enemy of the egg, guerrilla marketing is the implacable enemy of all the assumptions that pass for business as usual."
“Life Promises For Success” was published before the 2011 scandal that forced Tressel to resign from OSU. In spite of that ignominious ending, it is hard to argue with the success Tressel achieved during his tenure in Columbus – seven bowl appearances, including five BCS bowl games; five 10-win seasons; four Big 10 titles; and one national title. His overall coaching record is 208-72-2. All those numbers add up to one big fact: He is suited to write a book about finding success in life.
indigenous societies, have no bearing on the way these objects are
With all the time team members spend together in meetings (5.6 hours – the average amount of time an employee spends in meetings each week – Inc., Inc. Data Bank, Crunching the Numbers, May 2012) it’s surprising how often team members come away with different mental pictures of what the “department” is supposed to be and in what direction it’s supposed to be going.
But even if there were ways in which her methodology could have been tightened up, why has that not been done? Why have the people complaining about the poor quality of her research not done higher-quality studies and produced some successful results? If Rosa’s study is so flawed, it should be a single inconclusive anomaly, among a plethora of better controlled and more scientifically rigorous published papers. If that were the case, then we could acknowledge that the nine-year-old girl may not have thought of everything, and had mistakenly set things up in a way which didn’t recognise the genuine effects of this phenomenon. But all the evidence would imply that she pretty much nailed it. All the positive data we have on therapeutic touch comes from anecdotes and personal accounts, which aren’t enough to prove anything. All they can do is prompt us to wonder whether there might be something interesting going on here, and come up with some scientific tests to find out.
any other freezer listing people out there – am I alone on this one?
Not too long after that, we decided to put a toddler bed in her room. I admit, I was sad. I sat in her room, holding her, rocking her, taking in her sounds, her scents and her size.
Today is World Aids Day, a day of remembrance and solidarity for Aids and HIV sufferers around the world.
Decadent Chocolate cupcakes topped with dark chocolate ganache and brined bacon crumbles* paired with Mesquite Smoked Porter
Today (yesterday, Monday. What day is it?) I just clocked up over 5,000 words! That's the most I've written in a day. By the way, today (I mean yesterday) was my day off. That helped. But still.
All of the things that we need to get set-up and organized are many and if you aren’t organized you can get overwhelmed. I hope this venture works out, and I sincerely think that it will. But, win or lose, I am going to enjoy the ride.
We sat down with our food and saw the girl asking someone who appeared to be on the cooking staff. He shrugged his shoulders and turned to ask someone else, who apparently ALSO didn't know. Soon there were five people standing around discussing the shiny, and attractive button.
And I’m not sure quite what there is to be done about it. Because I think done right, it could be great—sweet and formal and old-fashioned without looking like something my grandmother would’ve worn to my parents’ wedding. But I’m not quite sure what that is.
2 loss
Have a wonderful weekend! See you back here on Tuesday.
On the first occasion, the container had been recovered four days later in the prairie section of the Middle West; but when it had been opened, the records upon the drums were found charred beyond legibility, while some of the more delicate instruments were warped and twisted into uselessness.
Seeing as how my wife and I have been together nearly 20 years…..this means we first hooked up when she was all of 9 years old….
“I dunno,” he said, working a mint around his jaw, “there's too much lip from players these days."
130gm water
The sufis say that a saint is one who reminds you of God. With him or her you experience a higher level of reality, in an instant, effortlessly. If anyone ever wonders where the women saints of Morocco are, have no doubt that they are there, making bread, raising children, pushing a candy cart around.
One example I can come up with is during a conversation about people trying weird fantasy and a person commented that he wanted to give it a try but didn’t think he would do it very well… so he just stuck with standard fantasy fare.
I'll be periodically updating on High School action, as every season new stars emerge that in short order make their way to the collegiate and international spot lights. I would bet that at least one of the youngsters named above will do just that.
Before we get to Don's query, I want to announce that along with him, Katie, and Alex, I'll be hosting the Origins blogfest on February 13th. I would put the sign up list at the bottom of this post, but I don't have the code, and you really should just go read Don's announcement post, because he does a great job explaining what it's all about. You can also sign up there, which I encourage you to do, because blogfests are the best way to meet other bloggers and build a following.
A man, whose family was German aristocracy prior to World War II, owned a number of large industries and estates. When asked how many German people were true Nazis, the answer he gave can guide our attitude toward fanaticism.
"I hope our trains are still going to run"
iz ok though coz granma was here today and she could put me down and i haz 2 hour naps so iz all energetik when he drags his self home from work.
And speaking of Stephanie, I just received an email from her last night letting me know how much she is enjoying rocking her new baby in the nursery Matthew created for her (as seen in the pages of Flea Market Finds with Matthew Mead).
I'm not a good napper and I woke up feeling even worse than before. Isaac, however, awoke full of beans and was bouncing all over the place! I hoped that a spot of baking might wake me up and make me feel better. It usually cheers me up! With my little assistant following behind, I shuffled into the kitchen. I quickly lined the tin and then started to weigh all of the ingredients into my mixing bowl.
Therefore, because my preferred response to being afraid is to step into the fear and embrace it no matter the outcome, I'm gonna throw my essay out here in its raw form for the entire world to see. Alea iacta est.
There are a few additional steps involved in making this recipe compared to traditional brownies. The brownie batter itself is pretty standard, but instead of baking it all at once, half is added to the pan and baked, then once it cools briefly, the caramel is poured on top and then covered with the remaining half of the brownie batter. Here's the thing - the recipe actually call for melting down store-bought caramel candies with heavy cream for the caramel layer. I decided to try subbing my leftover salted caramel sauce instead and while the brownies were tasty, they were sort of a mess. It was nearly impossible to spread the brownie batter over the sauce so instead those two layers were essentially swirled together. It took much longer for the brownies to bake and the caramel bubbled out the sides quite a bit and left me trying to chisel the brownies out of the pan.
The Invisible Bridge is a two-fer: the first half about a young man going to school in Paris, getting into trouble, and falling in love. (It’s the “We’ll always have Paris” backstory from Casablanca, if Bogie were Hungarian and Bergman older and had killed a cop.) The second half leverages our emotional investment from this deep grounding, as the Nazis, and their allies, round-up and exterminate Eastern Europe’s Jews. This is an engrossing read that has lingered in our minds, even as our raging bibliophilia has marched on.
He was later accepted into Instituto Marangoni, a school of fashion in London, England, as one of the 20 annual applicants, but deferred the opportunity to start his own fashion design business in late 2010. It was a risk he doesn’t regret.
What is it that they are hiding?
A spokesperson for Statistics Iceland, Olof Gardarsdottir, said to the AFP: “This is a world record. They live even longer than Japanese men.”
I don't even know what to do anymore. Do I spend the next few months taking her back to bed multiple times a night? Do, I go to the guest bed and lock the door and try to ignore Amos whining? Apparently, everyone else in my house can sleep through his whining. LOL! Plus, Zoe is really good at unlocking doors, so it's not like it would do that much good.
Caw.
Recently, I had a dream which drove me to awaken with sweats and untoward tingling sensations I very seldom get from dreams. The images laid upon my mind were confusing, but reminded me of a childhood tale I chose to block out of my mind later in life. The story in question was that of Bluebeard by Charles Perrault. The narrative itself, is said to be loosely inspired by Gilles de Rais, one of the world’s most infamous serial killers. Why, I cannot rightly tell you. De Rais was a serial killer who picked on small children (if the crimes attributed to him were, in fact, heinous acts of his doing) in an effort to gain a fortune from a demon. The Bluebeard of the Perrault tale, on the other hand, has motives that seem uncertain. Unless, of course, you think like a sadist, as I will prove in a moment.
All occupational categories reported growth in employment, but high-skilled categories (management and professionals) reported the strongest growth (+4.7%), reflecting the economy's ongoing reorientation toward high-skilled positions. Clerks, service workers and sales and marketing staff reported strong growth (+8.0%), reflecting the relative economic buoyancy of the consumer sectors of the economy.
Translation: Governance of the Internet must become independent from the government of the US. The EU Commission is happy for the retreat of the US — and will support the ICANN in this respect. Not only did the EU demand less influence of the USA, so did countries like Brazil and Iran, who regret the dominating position of the US on the Internet. The administration of the Internet must not be decided autonomously — the US Secretary of Trade always had a hand in the game with respect to decision of new top-level domains.
5:43 - Hillel Levine
This development prompted Sen. Franklin Drilon to say that once the UNCLOS establishes that Benham Rise is part of the Philippines, “we would have legal basis to enter into exploration agreements with private companies to explore…(the area’s) resources.”
4. Finally, the Bible tells us that giving thanks to God will help us control our words.
I swore I wouldn’t take the bait. There have been plenty of opinions rolling around the universe about the now-infamous Time Magazine cover, and I wasn’t going to add mine to the mental clutter being churned out daily on the internet. I had resolved to myself to spare you the various responses I’ve had since that photo broke; but ultimately, I cracked.
The first night they jumped on the beds like wild animals and screamed, "we're going to sleep in the same room FOR.EV.ER!"
I realized I was at a cross-roads with a girl I liked, one that didn’t reciprocate that feeling. I had just talked to her, and I didn’t know what to think; she wasn’t the person I thought she was. And I was listening to this song with all these turned and jumbled feelings and I realized: I didn’t love her.
Bean: Where is my fishing pole?
This is a difficult post for me to write, because I know so many people have worse problems going on than I do. But I'm writing it because I don't know what else to do.
I have to confess that, in part, interviewing so many brilliant children’s authors has just been a whole lot easier than wittering on about what I’ve been up to – mostly because what I’ve been up to equates to STRESS. I can’t say, given my post about being glass half full, that I’m particularly proud of that, but I guess sometimes life just gets in the way and gets overwhelming.
A few years back, Scientific American magazine published a study suggesting the Earth’s poles are very susceptible to this global warming. It calculated that if the ice of Greenland, Antarctic East, and Antarctic West all melted, it would raise the ocean levels by 179 feet. Eighty percent of the world’s population now lives at sea level. Can the seas rise so dramatically? Such events are not unprecedented.
I just have to do it by myself.
Spirit selection is impressive and the prices - at around 20 Euros a drink - are entirely reasonable for a hotel of this caliber. However, I was slightly less impressed with our second round of drinks, which were house creations. Unfortunately, I am very behind on my blog posts, so I can't remember which ones we took - I only remember not being as wowed by them as I'd hoped. So, excellent marks for the classics and I’m staying open minded about the house concoctions.
We have little bunnies all over the place, but they are so fast that the dogs don't see them. The dogs are more mesmerized by the quail. I love the sounds that the birds make around here. It's like a jungle. We also have all kinds of beautiful trees and plants with flowers -- none of which I am familiar with.
So what will it be K? Party-pooper or go-getter?
It was a white person palooza! Lots of trashy, drunk people inexplicably crowded into this indoor/outdoor waterside bar, drinking specialty drinks called "Buzzards" and listening to a southern rock cover band. (Yes, they played "Sweet Home Alabama." Twice.)
And for that matter, would Harriet Harman, assiduously promoting her equality agenda as the General Election nears, wish to discuss gender issues with a man who, when charged with rape in 2005, protested in court that the alleged victim was wearing an extremely short skirt.
Stand mixer with paddle (or whisk) and dough-hook attachments (optional)
I hope everyone who took part enjoyed the challenge as much as I did.
I was, shall we say, "doubtful" as to whether or not getting on and off trains at a particular station and running back to the right platform, without time to think about where she would be going, was a good idea. Especially given that she would have had very little sleep to add to the problem....
Now, this is fodder that’s gonna keep me going for weeks and weeks here, so you need to stay alert and attentive Fruitloopers, ok? AND try to keep up!!
Numero 4: Real piñatas are parties. In Spanish you can say you are “going to a piñata” and that gives you the whole idea: party, cake, candy-grabbing, stick-swinging fun.
A feeling of disappointment settled on me but I tried to put a good face on it. "That's to bad I was looking forward to going dancing tonight."
On arrival, it was clear the venue would not exactly align with the look and feel effused by the website - on a small street off the far end of Colorado, past the main strip of restaurants and shops, Maison Akira is in an unassuming red brick building several doors down from "Sushi of Naples" (a hybrid sushi restaurant / sports bar offering all night happy hour and a rowdy crowd).
Honestly, I see it all the time. It's as if they've never been to a petrol station before! How the hell can this be?!
Everyone thinks of Demons in a different way and many have brought them to life in books, films and on television. Each time the demons can appear in different ways depending on the creators interpretation, so here I give you mine.
Here are some of the cool items that were up for auction...imagine many football fields of things like these. Love that galvanized can and that old fan ...there were scores of them.
Jonathan Lovett
"Training your child" means doing something to him or her. On the other hand, "helping your child learn" to use the potty is absolutely something you can do with your child as a "partner" rather than a
Please forgive a little personal history, but our theme is ghosts, and our ghosts usually appear when we put up our decorations. Only today they didn't. It seems we've rather carelessly annoyed them.
Your heart which I can’t have Break Down
We had a computer glitch at home yesteday when Elsa, one of our fur babies decided to play with the cables and managed to disconnect everything. It's taken until now for DH to fix it why I am late in sharing my page for the CSI #13 case file - "Little Lady".
I am not sure I am going to make it to 6. Master lets out a small chuckle and quickly thrusts 4 more times and gets to 6! I am off and flying, and Master keeps me there til I just need to breathe.
Today I took 0.2 kilos from yesterday (which made me gain 1 pound back) even if I was on goal yesterday. It’s probably because I didn’t drink enough yesterday or because of the episode with the birthday cake. It’s ok after all I asked for it and I can deal with it, I just have to keep on goal and exercise. The gain doesn’t matter because I was good yesterday, today too and I feel more positive about the whole weight loss situation. Going for a walk released some of my “looking for a new house stress” and I feel more relax than a few days ago.
Hoping you're full of Summery joys too...
In 2001, this grew by 3.5% to $147K.
If you are interested in color and interior design services, please call me at 818.825.0155, or shoot me an email at kelly@artestyling.com to discuss your project.
I stood there for a minute, then yelled at the ever present-crows. “If you help me find this trail again, I promise you part of our next kill!”
There is no shadow in Your presence
Starting today, there will be ONE extra winner chosen at random from the challenge entries (excluding the other winners)! This will be in addition to the usual Grand Prize and Honorable Mention winners! That's one more chance at winning JustRite products! We hope this will encourage you to share more of your creations with us whether you are new to JustRite or you have been using our products for years!
But the main objection Byrd heard from these would-be candidates: “Do I want to put myself and my family through what it takes?” Looking at the prospect of running, Byrd said, candidates saw only negative ads and attack politics. Among would-be candidates, there was fear and loathing of “the permanent and
Thanks for keeping up with our little blog! I promise to attempt to be more interesting soon!
Fairies don’t belong at work.
Here I get an APA or IPA out of an English Pale Ale. I dry hop it with 1/2 ounce of Summit. Any of the orange profile is from those hops. This is my second batch to use up the other 1/2 ounce of Summit and because the first batch tasted so good.
Póg mo thóin!
“Tell me,” she said.
Autopsy Reports
FORMAT/INFO: The hardcover edition of City of the Snakes is 307 pages long divided into four titled parts and an epilogue section. Each section is further divided into titled and numbered chapters for a total of twenty-seven chapters. The Narration is via first person and features Al Jeery for the major part and Capac Raimi for the remaining chapters, the individual narrators of the previous two books. This is the third book in the City trilogy and is set ten years after the events of the first two books. This book will have to be read after the first two to make sense of the over arcing plot and characters and only then can the entire story be wholly appreciated.
The Renault car company has sold its remaining shares in the eponymous Formula 1 team, which will be renamed Lotus Renault in 2011.
One of my favourite things about blogging is my followers. I honestly get so excited every time I get a new follower and I smile every time I read a new comments I am so happy to being doing my first ever giveaway to say thank you to all of my wonderful, dedicated followers.
And if you were even slightly prepared for this stage, knowing that the pulling and stretching was coming, you forgot that you too were part of the dance. That the relationship was going to be stretched by both of you.
I got to go to a retreat in Ohio and spend some time with some Wonderful Ladies. I had the time of my life and am so blessed to know such wonderful Friends through this Hobby!
Fortunately, I got the email the next day! I was so happy! My username is EchoErised18673. Pottermore wanted me to provide my real name, but I thought for a second, then put ‘Lily Neville’ as my name. Next came a Hufflepuff-ish moment when I forgot my password, which was Harry Potter-related, so I couldn’t log in. Can I get any stupider? I don’t think so!
Not taking either food, heat, power nor shelter over my head, transportation, weather conditions or accessibility in various shapes for granted. Nor health it turned out.
The blind man did not speak Japanese, so he had someone whisper the subtitles to him!
Mouth torn, reaction products in the eye, electrodes placed on the head, shave the skull, all of which must surely patients shocked by this experiment that took place in the English Lush Store. The English kings remain in Shocking as with the anti-smoking spot , and of course with campaigns on road safety. Tamsin Omond, the manager of the campaign Lush says that tests on animals have been banned in Europe for three years, but these tests still exist in England, the United States or Canada. In China, even these tests are mandatory.
I recently deviated from my usual posts and went technical, posting a piece entitled Getting Haloscan to work in Beta Blogger. After switching to Beta Blogger and spending many hours of struggling with this specific technology issue before getting it working, I thought it would be nice to give back to others. Almost immediately my web hit counter went up by about 200, most of them directly going to this post either from a search engine (mainly Google), digg link or another blogger referral. Considering the combination of Blogger Beta and Haloscan users is probably not that large, I found it interesting that over the next 2 weeks I had at least two thousand more hits on this single post. What I found even more interesting was about the browser usage, which I pulled from my Google Analytics account:
It's time for me to confess, I do not respect the character of Bella Swan from the Twilight novels. I understand the appeal of Edward and Jacob, although as "bad boys" they are already pretty tame. (People far more qualified than me explain the appeal of the bad boy).
Indian food is one of the seven culinary wonders of the world.
And then the bear dropped his right paw ….. brought both paws together…bowed his head and spoke: “Lord, for this food which I am about to receive, I am truly thankful.”
Matt's already left for work, it's crazy how early he has to get up and get going. I had breakfast with him, oatmeal with flax seed and fresh blueberries and a cup of almond milk. I am trying to get whole grains and a serving of fruits and/or veggies with all 3 meals. Then have fruit and a protein bar for one snack and something with fat, like avocado, cottage cheese, yogurt or spinach and artichoke dip with carrot sticks or zucchini, for another snack.
What I loved most was that as the climax of the story unfolds, Sparks keeps you guessing until the very last page. You know something terrible is coming, but to whom? Surely not Elizabeth's 10 year old son? Elizabeth herself? One of the two men in her life? The ending is suspenseful and gratifying!
Oh and hey did you notice? I got a better camera… aka my new iPad!
This family has seen enough sadness in the last 12 months. Susie’s beautiful Mum was diagnosed with cancer last year (for the second time) and lost her battle on July 1st 2011. Not long after, Susie’s marriage broke down after 22 years. Now, Susie will be burying her son. And on Mother’s Day, she will not only be without her Mum for the first time, but also her son.
(Amulet Books, an imprint of Abrams)
The story. I just spent 13000 words expounding on how fucking awful the story is, if you haven’t figured it out already than holy fuck. A quick little point that I probably haven’t made entirely clear – the second half isn’t as bad (or at least not outstandingly so) as the first for the most part, but it’s all still absolutely hilariously awful. Especially the finale.
However, we didn't need a dining room or kitchen table, so a few years ago I switched out the legs of the dining table for the legs of a coffee table. It works great as a coffee table...large enough for all our family gatherings and parties. The thing I hated the most...my dad varnished the crap out of it. Sorry about that, but I couldn't explain it any other way. The wood was so shiny, you need sunglasses if the light hit it. Ok, maybe not that shiny, but not the natural wood look that I like.
This story caught my eye. Jude's Barbershop in Grand Rapids, MI is in trouble for providing a complimentary beer with haircuts. Jude's owners claim the practice of offering alcoholic beverages at no charge to customers is common in the hair and beauty industry. And it IS! Women get offered a glass of bubbly when they go to get a pedicure almost anywhere. Why can't a guy have a beer with his haircut? Just because the poor, deprived men of the Grand Rapids city council haven't had the pleasure doesn't mean that it is a BAD idea!
In one day, several representatives slipped over into the "No" camp. Most of them Republican, and I am free of any rational explanation for that.
We used my favorite seasonal flowers - peonies, roses, ranunculus and lilac - and pulled the rest from my garden. The big lesson here is that you can work with what's around your house or apartment to create something truly gorgeous. I learned so much while filming with Holly and I hope you find this video inspiring.
But these all were excuses and I had no other choice.
2 tablespoons flour
In the end, Belcher is trying to set up a third way between the traditional church (fundamentalism) and the emergent church. His third way envelopes three elements for defining the body that Christ left for his work on Earth. They are the Bible, traditions and culture. Of course, both the traditional and emergent church believe they are using the Bible in their development, but they see the Bible in very different ways. The traditional camp interprets the Bible based on traditions. The emergent side works from a context of understanding the Bible according to the culture.
that I have to carry me through to an end.
“Sure, Mr. Joe’s ravioli was really good. I like Mr. Joe; he’s a really kind man.”
3. Frosty the Snowman
P.S. I'm not sure if it's still available in stores, but if you're interested, you can order it through the website here.
~In addition to the fabulous Inky products you will receive, you will also get extra goodies from our challenge sponsors.
Drew her beloved Crenos as a random request. Used up a whole day to do. Her references were not very… detailed. Though most parts were easily obtained.
I’m really hoping to get an iPad for myself one of these days. I keep thinking how great it would be for reading all the pdf’s I get to review through the TOS Crew.
The last two topics on ACLU’s agenda, “Publish police policies on the police website” and “Civilian Review of Police” had to be deferred for another time due to constraints on time for Leggett. Mike Mage from ACLU reported that although these items were not included in latest negotiations with union (which already concluded) they can be brought up ad hoc during the contract period and Leggett agreed. At the ACLU chapter meeting last week, Mage shared the history of previous attempts to establish a “citizen review commission” brought by a broad coalition of groups. It initially had the support of the FOP (Fraternal Order of Police) union since the original concept was to allow officers to bring complaints against department management. But after a while they backed off and the idea stalled, then went nowhere. Mage wants folks to discuss topic again with their organizations to determine if there is enough support and willingness to do the hard work it would take to revive this campaign. Today there is no public visibility/transparency in complaints lodged against county police officers. Mage says most if not all complaints are determined by Internal Affairs to be “without merit” or result in “officer was reprimanded” which is meaningless, nothing but a slap on the wrist. I personally agree that a civilian complaint review board is warranted, especially considering the broadening militarization of police forces, expanding grants and ties with DHS, JTTF, FBI, ICE, NSA, and the increasing police violence and deaths and injuries from Tasers, tear gas canisters, rubber bullets that we’re seeing all over the country. I’ll raise this topic at the next MCCRC monthly meeting on May 2nd.
Thought: I feel rich when my fridge is full. That is like having lots of money in the bank except that it’s lots of food in the fridge. Whatever your craving, it’s there- in full. Any flavour, amount, texture. I love it when I have all the essentials but when your fridge is full, that means the auxiliaries are there too: sauces, herbs, dressings, spices. Additives you don’t even have to think about ready to go. You can’t beat that feeling.
The SARS website states, “South Africa has a residence-based system, which means residents are – subject to certain exclusions – taxed on their worldwide income, irrespective of where their income was earned. Non-residents are, however, taxed on their income from a South African source.”
The kids are morons.
As I walked back up the hill to the place I was staying, something started bothering me. Was this a pang of conscience at having misled an innocent group of people?
How has it been, this season, to have so many storylines keeping you apart? Does it feel more challenging to get you guys all together in scenes?
Wednesday - Wedding Pallooza Recap - photos!!
A lovely rose I spotted blooming in a backyard in my neighborhood. The backyard is separated from the sidewalk with a concrete fence. The top of the fence is concrete lattice. I shot it through a triangle in the lattice.
Rachael de Vienne, author of Pixie Warrior, is a top-notch researcher and an author of lovely pixie prose. Anybody with a fine appreciation for a look backwards via pictures, artwork and thoughtful posts will like this blog.
Now she'll be dating and next month she'll have her driver's license. Oh, and she's waiting for a phone call to see if she'll have a job through the holidays, too. I don't think I'm ready for this. Can I be this old? Wasn't I just turning 16? (Sigh...) The fun part of her getting older is we have a lot of fun together. She's my scrapbooking and jewelry making buddy. We had so much fun going to basketball games together last year. She's my fashion consultant. She's my friend. I sure love you, Cheyenne!
as you didn't fit my pregnancy-swollen feet last spring and summer.
The weather was glorious, and while St. Patty’s revelers were screaming outside, I filled four large trashbags for Goodwill, stacked his beloved Nike basketball shoes in a new shoe rack (he has a love affair with sneakers), labeled his drawers by category so he would not forget that the top drawer is for accessories and the bottom is for long-sleeved t’s. You get the gist.
Do you miss living the country life?
repose of lives of those
I couldn't stop thinking this is most likely the last time I will get to hold him.
It was my first team meeting for PartyLite last night. They hold a team meeting every month, and there's also a regional meeting of about 40 people every month, too. I took my friend with me, as she's interested in the business as well.
Tyndall played collegiately at Morehead State from 1990-93. He earned his bachelor’s degree from Morehead State in 1993 and his master’s degree from LSU in 2000.
Buck Black, founder of TruckerTherapy.com, knew he wanted to become a therapist when he was in fifth grade. Buck says about how he got started, “I have always enjoyed helping people and talking with people. The more I studied psychology, the more interested I became. Once I started volunteering at a crisis hotline, I was hooked.”
instrument backward over a track. And so that's what the cunt did. Fuckin harmonium's gonna be the laughing stock of the music world now. You should hear it! And this McCake cunt with his mate Bamber Swirlington, that here's-me-and-who's-like-me coke-fiend nincompoop editor of Assassins Of Cool Magazine, are gonna be releasing the demo this week, with an eye on releasing it as a single. This can't happen. So I sent a coffeejar bomb to Assassins Of Cool Magazine's offices. It weren't real, like. Just a big coffeejar with a little clock inside with two batteries bluetac'd on and a few wires sellotaped to the back of it. Then I wrote a letter to the controllers over at the State Sponsored Airwaves up there, told them that Pilers McCake was not a man possessed of musical integrity but possessed very much of a great and sleeket mendacity and that they should take him off the airwaves at once. I also sent the police and the controllers over the State Sponsored Airwaves photos I'd mocked up of Pilers and Bamber going at it with an Alsatian and Madeline McCann respectively.
They have no speech, they use no words;
"Calling Card" – 5:24
First, they are no longer frightened of the police. Spare me the idea that they shouldn’t be, and that the police are a service and not a force. It was, as so often, patrician liberals who decided a generation ago to transform the cops from tough but fair enforcers of the law into politically correct social workers, composed of sufficient women and minorities to make NDP candidates feel comfortable. Teens and students know the worst that will happen to them if they act like animals, is a stroke and a telling off.
The diminishing fear loses power o’er me
but on hearing or saying or even thinking ‘Jesus’
Psalm 46:10 Psalm 89:15
Have you ever felt this kind of love?
i tried to fantasize about life. a life outside the dark bedroom that was becoming more and more like a goddamn crypt.
Today was our first day of no-schedule, nothing-to-do Summer Break. Oldest, Middleson, and Babyboy all slept until 8:30. Over the weekend I began filling in the blank page of today with projects I have been wanting to complete.
Further Objections to the World Ensemble Hypothesis
I wanted some konad design that would scream: I'm not old yet!
Coincidence? I don’t think so.
In other words, an accomplished taqiyyah master must tell the truth if it will accomplish his goal, but may lie if his goal is unrealizable through truth-telling. If the goal is mandatory, lying is mandatory.
Late Recovery
I didn't know the measurements of our current dorky looking front door at home,
I first found James Rettie leaving Glasgow on 2nd May 1908 on the steam ship Ionian bound for Quebec and Montreal in Canada. He had Contract Ticket Number 260 and is listed as a ‘Labr.’ (Labourer) aged 36. This fits with the date of birth I had of 31st October 1871. His emmigration also explains why I could find him on the 1901 Census (working as a General Labourer and living with his widowed mother Harriet in Aberdeen), but not the 1911 Census.
3) Would you go to Egypt?
Everything was delicious! our guests enjoyed it and served several times :o)
life will never really be in harmony and you will constantly live with an
Already we’re seeing the damaging winds in Central / South Michigan along the Indiana Border going into Ohio and even into south Canada / Ottowa / Toronto.
“Nuthin’ but a ‘G’ Thang”
One of the biggest changes in the flight simulator 2006 is the addition of a structured game play.
fall from your hair
Why I included this book: Another Printz honor book that sounded fun to read…it was!
I’m asked this a lot. And, YES, I have considered it, but in it’s current academic form, I’m not for it.
Quick recap: My husband and I met in San Francisco. We were vegetarian city kids. I spent 14 years a vegetarian. The only thing I knew about animal slaughter for many years I learned from PETA brochures. I always wanted a farm, but I thought I'd have a vegetarian farm. I was young and naive. ;) Then we decided to stop being vegetarian but eat only meat humanely raised. Shortly after that our good friends taught us how to butcher ducks and then a pig. We learned so much from them! (I'm talking about Brett, who wrote for the winter newsletter :) ). So really, this is still all so new to us. It doesn't come naturally yet (at all), and we have no idea how to properly cut meat into fancy things like steaks. And I feel like I'm reading another language when I read meat cooking recipes, never having cooked it in my adult life. But, we're making great strides and learning more & more all the time.
As the teacher at the drop-in center, I saw the kids who chose to come downstairs to my windowless rooms, lit by the strange blue light of my glowing computer screens, to let me poke and prod at their brains, filling in the gaps left by too many self-imposed "vacations" from school, too many schools in general (one kid had been in seventeen schools between the ages of five and fourteen) and too many years when their brains were simply in survival-mode, which left precious little time for learning.
I’m proud of being successful. I’m proud of being in the free enterprise system that creates jobs for other people. I’m not going to run from that.
In the last installment of this series, I wrote about the divide between our real and our virtual selves. We plunge ourselves ever deeper into our virtual worlds and the character we embody inside of those worlds. But there is nothing that more literally embodies the virtual world than virtual reality.
“Were you sexually involved with Dr. Hamilton?”
We made it.
My inspiration this week is kind of the Indie preppy look, I would say. More casual and straight-lined. I'm looking for outfits that are both creative and work appropriate, and maybe less frilly simultaneously.
ARCHETYPE
“We will not go back to an economy weakened by outsourcing, bad debt, and phony financial profits… It’s time to apply the same rules from top to bottom: No bailouts, no handouts, and no copouts.”
18. How would you describe your personal fashion concept in 2010?
MLF has branches in Malawi, but they are hoping to eventually be in any and all developing countries that could benefit from their services. Jen mentioned that one of the difficult questions she gets pretty frequently from potential donors is “why don’t you offer your services in the U.S.?” The answers are many. For one, it’s not quite feasible in the U.S. yet. $100 doesn’t go as far in the U.S. as it does in Malawi (obvies). Another reason may sound unfair, but hey, didn’t your mom always tell you that life isn’t fair? Developing countries simply need these services more. Sure, there are people in the United States who would greatly benefit from similar services, but at least the United States has some form of infrastructure and other safety net services that help people out. Women in Malawi and other developing countries literally have no other option, and would probably be unable to feed their family if they didn’t have these financial services through Micro Loans.
She rarely screams or complains and when she does ask questions, they’re usually driven by honest inquisitiveness to inform and improve her position in the story and not to clarify things for the audience.
Your motives are noble. But they are not in tune with the times. Do you seriously believe that because of European currency reform the majority of Germans would suddenly favor blitzkrieg and attack their neighbors? This kind of argument is so far removed from reality and — with all due respect — ludicrous, that it seems incredible that broad elements of policy are elevating this mischief to supreme maxims of thought and action.
– Lord Chesterfield
Perhaps it's because I don’t have that stereotypical “black girl attitude.” Maybe it’s because I don’t wear Jordans and say the N-word. Or maybe it’s because I have light skin. Whether it be a combination of every reason or just one, the message is clear: I’m not allowed to be black without a white person's permission.
One of the sadder things I learned is that Vegans are not really one large, powerful group but that there are sub-divisions of Vegans based on their theoretical perspectives. I knew that some people were Vegan for the animals, some for the environment and some for health but what I didn’t expect was the in-fighting between Vegans. Rather than using their energy to fight against the people and organizations that truly abuse and exploit animals, there are some Vegans who choose to aim their anger at other Vegans fighting the cause in a different way.
I'll tell you why. Meteor may have cost a good amount of money to make, but it had a cheap script. It had producers willing to cut corners. It had actors who didn't believe in the project. It had a premise that may have worked if the effects were better and the sense of urgency was there. That Meteor failed in every avenue is not so much of a surprise as it is an indictment of what was wrong with science fiction after the success of 1977's Star Wars.
More burden for tax payers.
Day 7: Do you do something to honor your angel(s)? If so what?
If you believe into Christ, but refuse to be conformed to the Image of Christ, don’t think that all will be well with you when Christ returns. Some will be put to shame when Christ returns. They held onto the world, and therefore, they must be disciplined. This discipline is so that they may be conformed to the Image of Christ and join in the New Jerusalem. They will not join in the Sabbath Rest of the Millennial Kingdom, since they are not yet fit to reign with Christ.
As so, we began, as did I and moved inevitably toward the first meeting of the State Commission.
Lady Gaga is all the rage
And then there was one
I did do a little drunken driving in my early days and of more recent times, I may have threatened an obnoxious neighbour with some rather unusual bodily bodily harm.
"Noted Breweries of Great Britain and Ireland, vol. 3", Alfred Barnard, 1890, pages 118 - 119.
¾ cup wheat flour
This gave me a new direction for my book reviews. Why not make them more like book commentaries instead? Write about what I learned from them, what stayed with me, what moved me, what was useful, entertaining, or enlightening? In that spirit, I think I’m ready to write about books again!
I'm always looking for beer I can't get in Texas, and this one came to me through one of the internet beer stores to the right. Deschutes Brewery's Obsidian Stout has many characteristics of the bigger impy stouts that I love, with a little less alcohol. To me, that just means I can drink more of it before I get to where I can't taste anything.
Don’t confuse this with the usual advice of “take time for you” or “take time out for your relationship” that you’ll hear from everyone. This applies strictly to when you are sick. Here’s why:
Family Service League is a Non-Profit agency and they are donating to one of their 23 programs, the long-term care Ombudsman program’s adult home project. This project, lead by a member council of residents who still reside in these homes, is for residents with mental illness living in NYS Dept of Health Adult Homes.
I really feel like baby Ayla's arrival completes our circle of life in a very unique and unexpected way. I am very anxious to meet little Ayla... she is a very special arrival to our world indeed! If you are interested, and Ayla's mommy agrees, I will write a post about her on my blog at a future date. Barry would be very happy that this little baby's arrival was his last post....
Mm. Fond memories. Really enjoyed these two characters.
Gabriel’s book helped me see a different aspect of life with the many stories in his book. His words inspired me to create a picture which may go on to inspire others in some way. This is how the Holy Spirit or the Life-force works with its power of love. Gabriel Ezutah loves to write and his words can be inspirational. I love to paint and maybe some will find inspiration in the pictures I create. This is an example of how love works to brighten the lives of those who come in contact with us and the work we love to do.
We try and lash out, hide, drink, smoke, watch mindless TV or use any number of distractions and think that we adjusted ourselves to whatever is happening. In that process of adjustment first, we are masking our capacity to understand and pushing it further down.
Despising wind, and rain, and fire;
We had just finished making sock monkeys for our Crafting Hope group so it was perfect.
Washington DRIVERS on the other hand...
This year, I know I'll be busy. I've got a... uh... spirited child who demands my attention 95% of the time while she's awake. That doesn't leave much time for anything else. Usually I can occupy her with treats or by letting her demolish my piles of papers so that I can cook some sort of dinner or do the dishes. But much else has to wait until after bedtime, and by them I'm just so exhausted that I don't really do much but sit around.
To expand distribution and perhaps to answer the Rock Bottom/Gordon Biersch merger, Breckenridge and Wynkoop Group will come together in a joint venture.
I've spent an inordinate amount of time over the years railing about the silliness of marketers who are constantly chasing people with no money (young people) and ignoring the people with lots of money (people over 50.)
If you treat a horse that belongs to someone else - most of the time, you're actually 'treating' the person or trying to convince the person to 'treat' the horse in a certain way - so that the horse can heal itself. It is not an exchange of energy between you and the horse - it is more than that. I've learned that if you don't hit the pocket right there and then, then nothing is taken seriously - there is a 'block' in the flow of 'energy' and in the end it is the horse that suffers.
He says, “I shave everything.”
1.- Overture - Produced by Tonedeff
How long did it take to learn?
And where there is sadness, joy.
It has been a very cold week (my friends living in North America will laugh at this) and other days of intense cold are forecasted.
I’ve always thought this was strange thing to think about in relation to bicycling. I’ve always just dropped my wallet in my right jersey pocket. No worries aobut having cash enough to cover lunch let alone an emergency. And my cards are in there too. I understand the first responders won’t go into your wallet for identification so I wear my Road ID.
“In the Pantomime season I never felt flat,
The Geej: When can I go visit my old (Montessori) school and (her favorite teacher) Miss Kim?
“Yes, that’s it.”
2. Sierra Nevada Stout (5.8%)- a highly underrated stout that has the malty sweetness, but also the bitterness that is expected from Sierra Nevada.
I am a backseat driver from America
I won't apologise for the amount photos I'm about to share, as a first time incentive trip achiever I'm probably a little bit over excited about the whole thing! I took these photos as I opened the bag to so you can imagine the whoops and screams I'm doing now!
I never liked coffee when I was younger. Didn’t really have much use for the stuff. It kind of made me an anomaly in my family. My parents and grandparents drank coffee by the gallon. Perked at first, later drip brewed, always with milk or, if need be, non-dairy creamer.
One of the problems we face as Lay Disciples of Jesus, is that the modern church is not structured to properly assist lay people, who are not part of the “religious establishment”, to follow the personal path of discipleship the Lord is calling them to follow. The modern church establishment does not expect lay people to enter into such individual callings. The establishment expects that any one who has such a call to either enter a seminary to become a priest, deacon, or minister or to join some religious order. It is difficult to overcome the prejudices of the past that have placed lay Christians as passive , un-empowered, servants of the clergy, having no understanding of things spiritual.
a professor at the Jesuit Georgetown University. Weber is part of
This week is spring break for my little ones, so I’m going to shake things up here at the blog in order to spend some extra time with them. I follow a blog called Gracefull Women where Julie Moore posts an occasional One Minute Devotional.
It saddens me to see a beautiful life art-form and science-of-life misunderstood and misinterpreted. But I guess that is what we humans tend to do. If we are a people that can crucify a holy man, we can also easily throw out the proverbial baby with the bathwater.
2010.09.06 Tajikistan Dushanbe 0 7 Fundamentalists toss a bomb into a disco.
Guy/Gal #1: Eats it up. Their self-worth and ego suddenly implodes to the size of the Atlantic Ocean when other attractive members of the opposite sex are around and are openly flirting with them in front of their partners. Their self-worth solely depends on OTHERS APPROVAL and not their partners. They are not secure in their committed relationships and obviously feel a lacking somewhere within. They believe b/c of that LACK that at any given time their partner will leave or lose interest. As a result, they use others outside of the relationship as a way to fill or “correct” what they feel they are lacking and hope that this will seal some sort of idea in their partners mind that they are super desirable with a boatload of options.
The National Institute of Mental Health (NIMH) conducted a number of independent studies on the effect of a restricted diet on hyperactivity. In 1982, the NIMH announced that such a diet helped only about 5% of hyperactive children - mostly young children with food allergies.
Here’s what is clear: In April 1990, then-Sen. Emil Jones presented a bill aimed at increasing pension benefits for city employees in the municipal pension fund.
than by surmising that the South African president has gone Zulu on
I’ve always made fun of those people who dress their dogs up, cook them special meals, and take them to the vet to get their teeth brushed. I’m a hypocrite. Just weeks ago I resorted to a canine version of “bootie shorts” with Depends stuck in them to keep my two dogs from peeing on my couch, my pool table leg, my rug…and anything else that might seem like an appealing urinal for these mutts. If it weren’t for my daughter Charli’s strong attachments to Max and D’Marcus, I’d have blessed two other lucky families with an old, grouchy, neurotic Schnauzer and a sweet, adorable, dumb-as-a-rock long-haired doxie. They are making me crazy.
